Your kiss brings me back to life
April 30. The last day of Autism Awareness Month. The last hurrah, although let's be honest, the wider world didn't really notice all that much and probably didn't learn all that much, either.
The central character is Canio, who was second-in-command to Saturninus in The Moon on the Hills. I remember Canio as a tough ex-soldier with a liking for alcohol and an unscrupulous eye for the main chance. In The Sower of the Seeds of Dreams he is revealed to be a more complex character than he first appears, haunted by the memory of a tragedy in his distant past. Canio has a nice line in cynical humour, and referring to their horse (Antares) as a third person in the party becomes a running joke between him and Vilbia. The development of his character as the narrative unfolds was one of the most interesting features of the novel for me. Part of this is achieved by showing his developing relationship with Vilbia. As Vilbia says as she learns more about him, “…some made me like you better, some not so well.”
Who knew that a visit to the gym could be so thought provoking and who knew that time spent in car ride, dripping sweat while we have to roll the windows down to get fresh air could provide some quality mom-son bonding?
e) Bartolomeu Dias, Vasco da Gama, Ferdinand Magellan
Thank you for sticking it out this far! I am really looking forward to your thoughts on today's previews. The other Design Team members who will be sharing projects are:
What makes this recipe flavorful, and occasionally time-consuming, is the swirl of fruits and vegetables in the batter. A Cuisinart makes quick work of all the slicing and dicing, but while convenient, the appliance is not required. Once on vacation I shredded the carrots and apples by hand on a cheese grater. An hour later, you could really taste the love in that batch.
I finally made the decision to let go of the first blog I started: Always Looking Up over at PNN. I originally started there because another author recommended it to me, I had no clue at all how to blog but wanted to promote my book, My Funny Dad, Harry. It was pretty simple to use and it grew to much more than just book promotion. We did lots of book reviews over there and wrote about our activities. I even let our pets blog there on their own separate pages: Cat Corner--Meow and Abby-Woof, Woof! It was also where I first blogged about our Miracle cat, Moe.
3 tablespoons oil.
Would you cling to the fog?
"IP and the moral maze"
The other thing that needs to be mentioned is the struggle in the everyday life of the residents of the rehabilitation flats, of the small time business owners in the markets, of the crisis in the lives of the many other residents of Nonadanga. It is true, they have received a small flat of 160 sq.ft., but is that enough for one family? The conditions of basic civic services are beyond reprehensible. We do not have clean water, there is an acute crisis of water in general. There’s no government initiated school, college, health-center or hospital here. The small area that is there as a playground for the kids will be taken over to build the park for the elite. Maybe for more profit, the government will demolish even these flats and will direct the evictees of Khalpar, Narkelbagan, and Govindapur rail colony to move further away. Or they will be enclosed within the net of the big plans of development. We the poor are out of place in this prim and proper city of the elite. Today we are entrapped in this tinned construction; tomorrow the entire Nonadanga will face the same condition.
Many thanks to Grace for writing this post and for allowing me to cross-post it so that it receives a bit more of the attention is so greatly deserves. I don't know about you, but the more I learn about the production, transportation and disposal of clothing and textiles, the more resolved I am to cut out all unnecessary consumption and only use existing/pre-loved textiles to clothe myself and sew with.
I’m crushed, just fucking crushed. And apparently it’s my fault for looking at his phone. Nevermind the fact that when we first setup his phone we had to put my email account on it and for a couple of weeks he was reading all of my email – including the comments coming from here. Yeah, let’s just conveniently forget about that, shall we?
It took more flowers than I had anticipated. I actually went back for more, because I wanted them to be really full. A variation of daisies, roses, carnations and mums were what I chose. Watering them is the trick! I used my turkey baster! ;)
Key features: You like rookies? We got rookies. Plus some sweet patch/autograph/RCs
One of the first lessons we learned is that constraints can help creativity. I know it’s not very profound by itself, and perhaps what I found to be most fascinating isn’t very profound at all, but I feel it is worth expounding upon.
As the plane was descending into Logan International Airtport, I realized how happy I was to be going home. Once again I started thinking about the word home. There's something about being on an airplane that makes me contemplate this word.
P.S. You can totally make these with out the shallot, I don't usually have shallots on hand, so if you are without, don't forgo the recipe, just alter... chop up some sweet onion or go sans- your choice!
There are more than 10 cases pending at the High Court and Court of Appeal, whereby most of the cases were filed in 2004 relating to the breach of contract. The negotiations are in process.
Macy!
What is the cause of placenta previa?
quiet even as a weaned child, yet may we be earnest and active.
Nickels is an honest portrayal of someone who must fight like hell just to live; but also, at the same time, takes risk to love and be responsible for a mess that was not her own doing but that she cannot escape. That is one of the most unjust things about abuse: the abused must live with, to one degree or another, the ramifications of the abuser’s actions. She cannot be absolved of responsibility, by spending X number of months in a prison, or visiting a religious leader, or doing penance in some other way. The aftereffects are always present, always causing tremendous pain and confusion and distancing, and often poverty, homelessness, depression, and more abuse. There is always hope, and many do get away and heal, but thanks to Post Traumatic Stress, the past becomes present, often at the most misopportune times. Characters and people do heal, so that the trauma lessens and becomes manageable, but it does not happen overnight. Healing occurs over years, and many of those years are very difficult and painful and confusing.
I was on Pinterest (my newest obsession) and I ran across a recipe for an amazing sounding brownie! I am a sucker for brown butter so I was immediately intrigued.
Sit back and read along as I share my journey. I honestly believe “This Just Might Be The Best Year Yet!”
But then, just when I’m shrugging, he turns around and does something like this:^^
The 3M solution is a very different type of product, aimed at a particular market (i.e. libraries) and including a pretty much total solution from the content through the applications to kiosks (a 3M speciality) and to their own ereader devices that are designed to be lent by libraries to people who don’t have their own devices. It looks to owe a lot to 3M’s long experience of self-service in libraries and looks like a well-thought through solution. Adoption will no doubt depend on price models and the content that is available. It’s interesting to see 3M getting into the content reseller market and all that is implied there. It will be interesting to see if this appears in other markets such as the UK.
The first danger of fundamentalism in leadership is the loss of love and joy in the Lord and grace towards those within the church. Quoting Barclay, Mounce sums up this first danger, “heresy-hunting had killed love and orthodoxy had been achieved at the price of fellowship.” According to Christ in Revelation 2, that was too great of a price to pay.
The Belgian parents were in their fifties and when I was there the two daughters were probably 17 and 19. Host Mama was petite and platinum blond with leather-brown skin courtesy of the tanning bed in her boudoir; she liked to wear tight-fitting blouses and Capri pants and ring her eyes with black liner. Host Daddy was an affable Teddy-bear type, with a paunch and saggy skin under his eyes. Daughter One was big and busty, with curly honey hair and a caustic smile; Daughter Two was small and slim and sharp-faced. I liked them and felt resonances between their family and mine. But they were also so different, so European, and I did not feel at home.
“At our shows, we want the kids to know that they’re part of our team too,” Coach Ladè Majic said. “We invite as many kids as we can to come sit on the bench, have a front row seat during the show, and get involved in all of the fun stuff we do.”
What is your way of studying form? How do you pick yours?
1/2 cup peanut butter or sunflower butter
~baking biscotti, first time ever and I think it turned out ok! I used this recipe, omitted anise extract, doubled the batch then divided dough into three parts to flavour them: cinnamon, chocolate walnut, and cranberry almond.
Our daughter was born on March 11, at 12:29 p.m. She was 6 lbs 13 oz, 19 inches long, and absolutely perfect. She screamed louder than her brother, and looked just like him at birth.
Today is the day that I stop eating for two, even though I am not pregnant.
Currently, I noticed a lot of people 'refuse' to make open communication, and have the thought that the superior reporting 'boss' is unreachable all the time. Even to get the 'boss' signature, it sounded so damn difficult. I just wonder why?
Of course, this raises other issues.
So first things first
It’s been 2 weeks since I played AiON and I believe I am not the only maricone playing this game. Last night I updated my AiON client and as soon as I logged in my legion mates started whispering me. I receive the usual welcome back messages (WB) and my good friend Xeline, a female online gamer enthusiast who have played with me since 2007 in games such as Guild Wars, Age of Conan and now AiON, whispered me bunch of questions.
¼ cup flour
46Love but demands what else were shed in pray'r;
I showed my partner the film Citizen X the other night, which she had never seen. It is a good HBO movie made for television, and youtube has it nicely in one piece. It is about the Russian serial killer Chikatilo, who killed at least 53 persons, mostly children, in the region about Rostov on the Don, an area something similar to Norfolk Virginia in density of population, climate, social perceptions and so on. At 1:30:30 of the film, the psychiatrist reads from a document he wrote about Chikatilo:
There are roses in lusty bloom
Further to that, we are calling for the establishment of an alliance political council made up of the national office- bearers of the alliance, to oversee broad political issues, governance and deployment issues and joint mass mobilisation.
I haven't hiked in about two weeks.
“Ever since she started seeing you, she’s been sleep walking.”
Preheat oven to 425 degrees. Grease a glass pan. Break bread into small bite-sized pieces and place into pan. Beat eggs and egg whites in a large bowl. Add half & half, sugar and cinnamon; mix well. Pour over bread. Top with powdered sugar and additional cinnamon. Slice butter and place on top. Sprinkle chopped pecans over all. Cover pan with foil and bake for 40 minutes; uncover and bake for an additional 15 minutes. If you want to make it even more decadent, serve with whipped cream and caramel sauce on top!
In massage therapy school, I was told to use “Universal Precautions“, and that is what I will leave with you today. I was taught in school that in using Universal Precautions, I would not assume which clients had a contagious disease, or herpes, HIV or AIDS. I was taught to use precautions that would protect me whenever I worked on any client. For some, that meant gloves, for some it was constant hand washing.
My dream was to come true.
It was a busy day for John. He was either attending meetings or preparing for meetings he had to attend. All too soon, it was the end of the day. Before he left for the day, he took a detour via his boss’s office. The desk where Casey sat was empty. His heart sunk.
Not only did Marie Myriam win and land a huge hit single with her song, she also celebrated her 20th birthday on the very day of the final. A double celebration for her, in other words.
This entry is to look into the rituals and superstitions that people have before games or races and the like.
ARTICLE 4
White light, and don’t you know it’s gonna make me go blind
At 18 she left Ireland and trained as a nurse in England, travelled to Greece, Israel, New Zealand and South America and emigrated to Canada in 1972. In South America she worked at the British Consulate in Buenos Aires as a secretary which gave her a chance to meet her Argentine relatives whose ancestors had emigrated from Ireland in the 19th century. Argentina became an inspiration for her writing and still remains so.
On my trip to Chicago for Labor Day weekend, I wasn't missing the Grand Army Plaza Greenmarket for long: my Chicago friends took me to the Green City Market at the south end of Lincoln Park, right near the Lincoln Park Zoo. Though we didn't buy anything since we were going to be out all day, I thought I'd share some photos of the market.
1 tbsp parsley flakes
Every revolution needs a catchphrase. The Tunisian uprising’s iconic image is a protestor holding a placard proclaiming: “Game Over”, as indeed it is for President ben-Ali. Note please that “Game Over” is English, not French or Arabic, the local languages.
Cream together butter and cream cheese. Add powdered sugar 1 cup at a time. Continue mixing. Add peppermint oil and salt. Pipe onto brownie bites or mini cupcakes. Garnish with peppermint Hershey kisses or peppermint bark.
Unlike me, instead of holding on to being discouraged about my children’s lack of responsibility – their inability to see the lost work and effort involved, the harried frenetic strain this placed on an already harried frenetic mother, my chickens were delighted and saw the bagels for what they truly were – little lumps of baked grain that in the overall scheme of things didn’t make much more of a difference than a filled belly for just a few minutes.
Then blackness engulfs me. The night sky waves and I swoop towards it, my mind at peace.
Robert J. Baierwalter, 44, Albertson, N.Y.
Special Olympics: The Special Olympics Organization is by far my favorite organization. This organization has branded itself to strive for equality for everyone with a special disability and also celebrate and embrace the differences between everyone. I’ve been a Special Olympics volunteer for as long as I can remember, and nothing has been more rewarding than helping the athletes. They’ve taught me valuable life lessons and some of the friendships I’ve created while participating in this organization are some of the greatest I’ve ever known. What I love about the Special Olympics brand is that it always updates people about what is going on with the organization. Whether it’s to get involved or it’s revealing personal stories of athletes, Special Olympics is maintaining good relations among followers, like myself, to get them the latest news. I think social media is crucial for brand awareness in this day in age, and the Special Olympics does a fantastic job in incorporating their mission into Facebook, Twitter, a blog and YouTube sites. When I want to find out how to get involved I can simply check their Twitter feed to see what is going on around me. I also love that Special Olympics introduces participants to their favorite athletes, including Michael Jordan and Apolo Ohno – it makes the whole experience come together. Overall, the brand this organization has built is one that is trustworthy and has fostered the “acceptance and inclusion of all people.”
Well, I hope you’ve enjoyed this and possibly learned something. Don’t take my word for it! Research it and find out what the best choice is for YOU. Choosing this kind of lifestyle isn’t for everyone, but if you are disciplined, you CAN make a difference.
Disclosure: I am not affiliated with Agropur, or this product, in any way. I just buy it, try it and review it.
at the class reunion, a girl spoke to me like
The programme looks at traditional and innovative means of access to copyrighted works, including e-books, online licensing and emerging technical platforms, and debates the role of exclusive rights and fairly balanced copyright exceptions and limitations in fostering creativity and promoting access in the coming information age when all the people become writers as well readers.
Er…I mean: This explains my philosophy of childrearing. Anyway, here’s a bit of the article, by Murrray Wardrop, in The Telegraph. (For some reason this story got more play in Britain than the U.S.):
Peachy Keen Stamps- Cuddly Faces, Princess Faces
Today was another day to get up early and get going. I have been in a little bit of a funk the last couple of days. My friend wasn’t able to meet me yesterday morning. So I didn’t go. I have found that I need someone with me. That is something I am working on, motivating myself. It is a hard thing to do.
blue skull.
“For the Communists we are Nazis, for the Socialists we are fascists and for the conservatives we are extreme right,” said Nas, a Golden Dawn member who declined to give his last name. “Let them call me what they want. I do what I do with honor.”
Wouldn't it be wonderful if we could all do our little bit to help?.
After this, He ascended into the Heavens. This is shown by the blue robe. This is where He is today, sitting at the right hand of the Father in Heaven.
Alastair Campbell, on the other hand, was apparently not available to speak to journalists last Friday about his own links to Astana. They failed to reach him by text, phone or email.
The contributors to In His Eyes include award winners, frequent "Top 100" placers, and hot 2011 debut authors.
come back tomorrow when i'll share a layout i made using these flowers!
All in all, I like the addition for the 49ers. This team didn’t really have any needs per say, so this was just a luxury pick. James is a tough guy, a competitor, and a winner. I believe that he will fit in just fine with this 49ers team.
I didn't sneak any cookies or chips.
Savard: Why.
Is it true? Or does it just feel that way? It's a statistical claim, so what data is the observation based on?
6/23: Winnipeg, MB @ Red River Exhibition - FREE SHOW w/ gate admission
Thanks to all of you for your interest in our sketches and support by leaving comments and of course following our sketches.
Just all around a wonderful group of people. To make me feel better, I wasn’t the only one who started to cry.
Do y'all ever wear the same thing for brunch that you'd wear to happy hour?
Enter vintage on Etsy! The store was up and running in less than an hour. Of course it’s not fully stocked. My goal in Apron Thrift Girl’s October Resale Challenge is to now list at least one item a day for the remainder of the month. My, do I have inventory!
I was asked recently to perhaps throw out some lessons learned on teaching the seminar/clinics I've been teaching because of the blog.
Sable Brushes – From the fur of sables (weasel-like mammals). Used to make eye makeup, lipstick, and artists’ brushes. Alternatives: synthetic fibers.
You put your money in this ETF, sit back, do nothing, and watch the value of the U.S. dollar fall as inflation and the national debt rise, and just watch this investment rise in value as the months go by.
2 1/2 teaspoons vanilla extract
Gladys and Tristan danced a tango to "Bohemian Rhapsody." She said she's the grandma of rock and roll and had to do well, or she'd be removed from the Rock Hall of Fame. She also said she wasn't going to show any class tonight and there wasn't a move that didn't come through rock 'n roll. The tango was really hard for her to learn, but she was determined. And move she did! This was intense and passionate. (another shot of Little Richard and also Jamie Fox) Carrie Ann said it was her most ambitious dance and that song was hard to dance to. I thought that myself but couldn't give reasons the way Bruno did. Score 20. The audience booed. I'm impressed with how she moves, bounds up the stairs, and isn't out of breath.
They said yes and invited me in.
Oh, how I love Christmas.
(Mine took precisely 12 minutes in my oven but I won’t guarantee you that it’ll be the same for you – check them after 10, when they’re done they should feel slightly firm on top but not hard. Remember they will continue to cook and harden as they cool)
I'll just start at The Bar.
2.Chop 6 garlic cloves. Heat 1 teaspoon oil over medium heat in a large saute pan or skillet. Add garlic and 1/2 teaspoon salt, and cook until fragrant, about 1 minute (do not let brown). Raise heat to medium-high, and add 1/2 cup water. Add two-thirds of the kale; cover, and cook until wilted, about 1 minute. Add remaining kale. Cover, and cook 2 minutes. Stir in escarole, and add a little more water if pan is dry. Cover, and cook ntil greens are wilted and tender, about 4 minutes. Remove lid, and cook, stirring frequently, until liquid
Two boys, approximately aged 7-10, were hanging out, clearly bored out of their mind. One asked the other, "what should we do?" "I don't know," the brother replied. "We could start hitting each other again."
MK: Well, I better go. I can't really talk right now.
This one is dated March 1980… and yes, its typed out from the days when we’d just got golf-ball typewriters in the Press Office, long before wi-bloody-fi laptops had been invented. And yes, that looks suspiciously like my scribble across it.
I loved working in his room because the view is stunning without being distracting, but also because it perfectly fitted the scenery of the book I was writing. I can see the tree that Sam hid in that night the man was looking for them in the woods.
The winless Cigarroa Toros were long overdue for a district win. Tuesday night, under the lights of Shirley Field, they got one when they upsetting the Nixon Mustangs 1-0.
It is a powerful and disturbing book that just might save a reader's life.
Rebelstar – Tactical Command (GBA)
Also in Chaoyang Park, it has a ropes course. First they teach you how to do it. You get 3 different hooks. There are colored cables where you hook your own carabiners. The guy spoke a little bit of English. There were 2 different ziplines – first you did your ropes course and then you’d climb to the top and take a zipline to the bottom. Then you did more course to the top and take a zipline again to the very bottom.
There was yet another woman at my high school who wasn't a teacher but rather the curriculum coordinator who started to make it her life's mission to convince me that I had to make the decision about how I was going to spend the rest of my life. Looking back I'm guessing it wasn't really her life's mission, and even then I knew that she was only looking out for me because she liked me, but seriously I tried to avoid that woman in the halls at all costs. I felt like I broke her heart a little bit more every time I told her I still didn't know what I wanted to do with my life.
Beads of sweat had formed along the nape of my neck and the top of my forehead, I opened the windows and doors to air out the humid kitchen (of course it was raining, but that didn’t change the humidity one bit, it’s been known to be stubborn) and got down to business. This time, as I turned up the heat on the pan, Ke$ha’s Tik Tok began to play. Mei talked loudly while Ke$ha sang, and I danced around some more, causing Mei to break out in another round of giggles. We danced and laughed our way through Ke$ha, Josh Strickland’s Report to the Floor, and finally Huey Lewis and the News… Hip to Be Square of course! Mei and I giggled, danced, while keeping a close eye on the pan… and believe it or not the dancing helped to keep the caramel swirling around! … Ok, maybe you are going to doubt me on that one, but by the time Milli Vanilli’s Blame it on the Rain began to play, the caramel had turned a beautiful amber color I took it off the heat and immediately whisked in the cream, turning the caramel into a delicious, silky, irresistible pot of golden caramel!
The bank funded Pamodzi’s deal at a time when hundreds of desperate farmers were battling to get funding for tractors, seeds, shovels and fertilizer.
When boys reach a certain age, they are often embarassed to be seen alone in public with their mom or to talk about close relationships with their mothers. It's really only the big, tough football players or otherwise macho men who are allowed to get away with close relationships with their mothers.
It seems that Brazil is finally winning its currency war.
I went to Comic Con and dressed up as Wolverine.
10. Tina Charles – Connecticut Sun*
Six out of the 17 species of penguin live in Antarctica, so the most enjoyable way to call on these birds is through a cruise in the region.
OG=1.050@67F
I feel a little defeated, but I know that once I get back to it, and re-sew those pieces so that they lay right, I’ll be back on track. It just may take a little time for me to be willing to pick it up again. Maybe tomorrow. I’ll let you know.
Leave it to Coloradans to give it a beer name.
Being active means “being engaged in action.” Christians should be interested, educated, engaged, and responsible citizens of the country they reside in. Their first and greatest level of engagement should be through prayer. Christians should pray for their nation, fellow-citizens, leaders, lawmakers, judges, military personnel, and everyone else for whom God gives them a burden. Prayer is the first and most powerful political strategy for the Christian.
release the gas the cat dies. But here’s the catch, for Schrodinger
Benjamin Noys’ The Persistence of the Negative is an attempt, as he explains at its outset, to ‘rehabilitate a thinking of negativity through an immanent critique of contemporary Continental theory’ (ix). For Noys, the latter is currently dominated by what he refers to as ‘affirmationism’: a tendency towards the assertion of creativity, desire, productive potential and the importance of novelty. Such emphases on the primacy of affirmative, creative constitution are said to have cast negativity as secondary and reactive, and this, for Noys, is politically problematic: as affirmationism is often linked to the assertion of anti-capitalist possibilities, the denigration of negativity has furthered the neglect of issues pertaining to resistance and opposition. He thus sets out to ‘excavate’ (13) a new notion of negativity from contemporary affirmationism; a negativity that will provide a means of strategically locating and actualising points of ‘rupture’ (4) within capitalist society.
Prism
'She understands me'.
He quickly assigned a squad for the mission:
Korea’s government is a republic with President LEE Myung-bak, serving as head of state since 25 February 2008. Oman is a hereditary monarchy with Sultan and Prime Minister QABOOS bin Said Al-Said (sultan since 23 July 1970 and prime minister since 23 July 1972) at its head; he is both the chief of state and head of government.
“If breathed in , move person into fresh air”
Kami Liddle
4. One thing I know for sure, ‘Timan’ can’t stay at home for more than 1/2 day. He needs an activity that involves running around, jumping and more running, burning energy, doing something physical. Any activity which doesn’t necessarily involve me every second of the day would do it and I’m starting to wonder how I’m going to survive these three weeks. How did I do this before? So fast did I get used to these 6 hours per day for myself.
“They’re always the end of something great, you know?”
The way the FIA F1 KERS rules are written there is a limit on the amount of energy that can be stored and reused. These limits are not in line with what is actually achievable with current technology. Teams are effectively capped on energy, as they could store and re-use far more. Part of the problems is that under braking, the energy harvesting is capable of producing more power than they are allowed to put into the battery. So the teams control the harvesting rate according the driver’s style and the circuits demands. Even then the harvesting potential is hard to predict. Rather than stopping the harvesting mid braking, which would unsettle the car. The teams keep the same harvesting rate, but dump the energy through a series of fixed rate resistors. Obviously these resistors quite large and create a huge amount of heat. This would explain their low position and cooling requirement.
Ughhhhh. Time to clean up all my tissues and get some sleep!
From the sixth hour there was darkness over all the land unto the ninth hour. And about the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eli, Eli, lama sabachthani? that is to say, My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me? The Lord hath laid on him the iniquity of us all.
You probably wouldn’t want to use this lighting arrangement for portraits, but it can yield powerful effects for a dramatic entrance of a dangerous character, or for conveying a feeling of cool detachment. Above: Dean Cornwell.
I prefer to let children do all of the above with rocks, twigs, dolls, dishes, hot wheels etc. The more they are allowed to relate math to their surroundings the easier it will be for them to identify how math is used everyday. Baking and cooking are also excellent tools to teach math, as are knitting or crocheting. Keep it simple, keep it real.
I cannot spit or barely breathe
The successful candidate will be someone who holds a PhD degree (or is awaiting conferment) and has research interests and expertise in Empires in Asia. Preference will be given to a candidate with expertise in empires in Asia of the 18th century. This includes but is not limited to systems, concepts, theories and networks of empire, imperialism and colonization. The Fellow will work closely with faculty members in the Department on a research project in this area.
As a positive, Vaalia does NOT have aspartame in it, like the tub of Yoplait Forme I picked up today (and put back).
Instead of spending a lot of money on a cake, I made a cake, did my best frosting it, and watched my little boy cautiously poke his finger at the frosting and lick just a little bit before deciding he'd rather have some banana puffs. And afterwards, we watched him tear into a few more presents.
So, I am amusing myself with Twitter and listening to Howie Carr when I get a tweet from a pro-Elizabeth Warren (Democratic candidate for Massachusetts US Senator). In responding, I find to my delight that @ElizabethNewsRTs is a bot that simply favorites anything someone writes about Elizabeth Warren.
News Americas, NEW YORK, NY, Tues. May 8, 2012: Miss Guyana World 2012, Arti Cameron, recently joined about 25, 000 people from all around the world in the Revlon Walk/Run For Women.
Canon 5D
Hold me in your hands and
I have to admit that I have not read these novels in order (sorry Cath) and I realize now that I did myself a disservice because much of the back story in the latest book revolves around an horrific accident that happened in the previous one in which Chief Inspector Gamache and his loyal second in command, Jean Guy de Beauvoir, were ambushed in a warehouse shootout, each suffering serious injuries.
Let’s be real..You aren’t going to have the luxury of eating EXACTLY the way you would eat with a kitchen at your disposal, but I’m not pulling your string (and certainly not your finger) when I tell you that “it is EASY” to eat healthy on the road. It really comes down to your dedication and will to succeed. That’s the only obstacle. Yourself.
Cuban officials also use the Coast Guard’s man in Havana to voice complaints about U.S. policies and practices.
June 21 Buffalo, NY First Niagara Center
If you like to shop online, I encourage you to go to the right side of the page and click on iGive. Participating companies (and there are hundreds) will donate a percentage of your purchase to the shelter. There are also coupons and good deals.
the street to drop off the older one but the little one kept trying
There are extremist members of the UAF/SWP. The leader of the UAF, Martin Smith, was also the National Secretary of the SWP. The SWP, in its own words,
You gotta shake it like a crazy,
When we broke that magic connection I sighed. After sitting and savoring the sensation that was wrapping around me for a few minutes, we got up and walked home, hand in hand. The streets were quiet. The only sound was coming from the patio of theInnon the corner near the park, where a guitar player sang plaintively of places traveled, loves lost and time gone by. We walked silently by, trying to avoid thinking of our own loss and time past.
Questions fill my mind about the power of loneliness. If loneliness is an inevitable fact of human existence, what potential are we not seeing in the experience of loneliness that may teach us? I have read many a poem depicting loneliness as an almost addictive and exquisite feeling. I have heard it said of loneliness it was palpable, as if it was in itself a consuming entity. Surely if loneliness is such a profound experience and all human beings have it on a continual basis, then it isn’t by its own nature, the cursed affliction that causes despair. Perhaps in its profundity ‘loneliness’ is our greatest guide to consciousness, an allegorical reflection of the conflict that is the very nature of the human versus spirit self. Loneliness has manifested from our own duality, that being said… just maybe then, if we find the potential in the affliction called loneliness, it may become a great mystical paradox.
Turn off these emails at: http:
I feel so refreshed today. I opened up to somebody who is damn near a stranger to me, my occupational therapist. I cannot believe that I did, but I can honestly say that it felt good to get it out there. He apparently thinks I should write a book about the insanity that is my life. I have thought about it on numerous occasions, just have never put it into fruition. It is definitely something that I have researched and put much thought into, perhaps one day I will take the plunge.
In brief, many (though not all) of these Tamils were thoroughly alienated by their experience of the last months of LTTE control. Such sentiments had the capacity to spread among other Tamils living in Sri Lanka. Such profound disquiet could have served as a foundation for some lines of reconciliation between these Tamils and the rest of the population — even though the government too was blamed for the turmoils they went through.
LOTUS PLAZA - Spooky Action at a Distance
Some other good news!! My youngest daughter, Amanda, my niece Heather and our friend Martin are getting baptized this coming Sabbath. I am excited! We've been waiting for awhile, since we were in between pastors for several months.
MSM is biological sulfur, which may...
Remove from oven, cool and then pop it into the fridge for a while. We had ours with cream but I didn’t think it needed it. If anything, I’d have mine with a big scoop of vanilla ice-cream.
“Be more thankful for what you have”
When I went to pay, the cashier got addled
On August 30, 2006, I responded at my article to a comment from a Men’s News Daily reader,
So...I made a highball. Took my Sly Fox Pikeland Pils willibecker glass, filled it with ice, poured in about an inch of Rittenhouse Rye, and topped it up with Stewart's Ginger Beer. Damn me, that was good. The ginger beer is so spicy my lips were tingling a bit (Stewart's isn't Blenheim, but it's good), the rye punched it up good, and it was cold and refreshing. I love a rye and ginger in the summer -- and it's finally summer, sunlight for a change!
and are open to being happy
That's just plain common sense. A child would know that.
The trend of multiple “youth” opposition groups has apparently spread from Nouakchott to Nouadhibou. Quite tiring trying to keep up with all the different groups at the moment, but I expect it will begin to consolidate before too long.
The whole region is beyond description when it comes to expressing the enchantment and majesty. And the allure of people to visit is overwhelmingly sufficient. This stretch of land is gifted with the artistry of God’s hand and is truly an awesome sight to behold. The obvious magnificence of the land is known throughout the state, and people have come from every corner of the earth to observe the glory of these prestigious mountains. The stunning, unrivaled graces of God shine through in Kentucky. It’s a place where things rarely change. Look at pictures from one hundred years ago, the only difference is a home that has popped up here and there. The people, on the Creek, have remained the same for hundreds of years. The Kentucky State Police helicopters constantly circle this area for it is the perfect place to plant the most popular weed known to mankind, marijuana. The hills and mountains are the livelihood of the country folks who flourish here. The land is engaged to the kinsmen, and it creates a song and dance that have no comparison. According to many native hillbillies, there is no better place in the world to live.
However, she does arrive at some of the same conclusions as other scholars. The virgin birth in Bethlehem and the crucifixion are more myth than fact. It is interesting that the Dead Sea Scrolls provide the same sort of evidence of the life of Jesus as do the Nag Hammadi Gospels. The Dead Sea Scrolls appear to be part one and the Gnostic Gospels of Nag Hammadi appear to be part two of the same story! Alone these non-canonical texts are puzzling, but as a part of a trinity with the canonical Bible they create a tapestry of truth.
This is the easiest thing ever. Grab some 2x4's or 2x2's, make a square or rectangle and nail or glue them together. (above)
2. Get one edge and fold it towards the center.
words, two souls are linked together to become as one. Any relationships outside of
Ok, bed time. Good night.
Our fabby sponsor is Simon Says Stamp
So today I wanted to share with you all one of my favorite breakfast, Oat Flour Blueberry Pancakes! They are oh so yummy. I had never tried them before and the day I did, I loved them. They are so moist and fluffy. You would never think that they aren't made with white flour.
The ear flaps should cover the back and side pieces of the cap almost completely. The edge of the ear flaps should come just short of the cap seams in the front. See my illustrations from step #5 if you need to. When I was making the pattern for my ear flaps I took measuring tape around my boys' heads from temple to temple to help me get the right measurement. You may want to do the same.
In another parking lot at another office, that might have been all that happened. But this was the parking lot for Child Protective Investigations — the one that’s part of the Pasco County Sheriff’s Office.
The enemy AI isn’t great and at times seems completely insane but to be honest the game isn’t about the challenge of the enemies, it’s more about you and your choices of how to take enemies down.
Erin Gray (Jason Goes to Hell: The Final Friday)
eBay wins in US
he helps me into bed, my cousin calls me and I burst into tears, telling me to get into the hospital.
I would add to the title of this post by saying that we also need brave superintendents and brave school board members. The article below talks about the courage it took for some New York City principals to stand up to the State Education Department, especially and inexplicably, because they weren’t getting the teachers’ unions of New York to support them. I am with Diane, why is that NYSUT?
I assume we’ll learn the answers to these questions before long. In the meantime, here’s the story from FOX News:
But I still wouldn’t wait too long …. there remains only seven categories from the original 27 onboard Holland America’s Westerdam.
Chaos is change and growth, entropic destruction, and the very substance from which everything is made…infinite possibility. The base substance/possibility of everything I think needs no example. Change and growth occur for as long as something exists and either grows, evolves, learns, or develops. A child into an adult, a seeker into a master, stellar dust into a star. Entropy gets a bad rap. It’s not just destruction, it is the necessary wear and tear that allow for growth and change. It is the necessity to balance pattern and structure so that stagnation does not occur. It is the necessity that ensures something new can come along.
What is 'spirited', you ask?
NOTE: This was updated later same day. We originally thought this house was bought by Blake Lively but a second look (and a hint-hint from The Bizzy Boys at Celebrity Address Aerial) indicates something a little different...
I do running on Saturdays and Sundays to make up for it. On Saturdays, I go to U.P. oval to go running with my friends, PJAM.
Since he has come home, we have been dealing with headaches, and today, headaches and vomiting. I know it is going to be a roller coaster ride of recovery, and it is too early to know if there will be any lasting effects from his concussion, but I bet it wouldn't have been so bad, or even happened at all, had he been wearing his helmet.
He envisions getting youth involved — his plan is to directly attack some of the most destructive messages being put out there by contemporary artists. “The false realities and destructive lifestyles promoted by today’s popular rap artists is a major factor in the apathetic youth we see in our nation today,” he says. “I aim to boldly fight against that destructive culture.”
Ale House at Amatos - Just opened, I have never been, but they are supposed to have over 40 beer on tap and they are located in downtown Denver.
TAMMY MARTIN is the lucky winner! And Tammy is a US resident so she gets the KINDLE FIRE!
If the short sale is not under the government program, the clock starts ticking when the borrower submits a short sale offer from a potential buyer and a completed borrower response package.
Snes – 50-80$ (100CAD) at the time
During the protests in Luton when Muslim extremists shouted abuse at the homecoming parade of the Royal Anglian Regiment, the police arrested a white protester but allowed the Muslims to abuse the soldiers.
03)Kenrick de Grijs – Leiden, Netherlands
42.Touch your face. Touching your face appears insecure and can also be distracting to those talking to you.
1/3 cup good quality crumbled feta cheese
My wife brought this back on her recent excursion to Memphis, on the recommendations of her coworkers in the area. And it would be a good recommendation if the beer finished the way I was hoping.
- That no animosity is felt towards Nads. We are merely trying to
I finished the night with a Tokyo*, which probably explains why I'm feeling a little rough today.
PS: CIO is a generic term and other analogous titles are Head of IT, IT Director, Director of IT etc.
Or to put it another way, get the hell out of my country.
Nowhere in these definitions does it say respect is only for your elders. It doesn't say you need to be a certain age, grade level, or have a certain level of experience. One doesn't need to be an adult to deserve this treatment. As a matter of fact, there have been many adults I have met who deserve less respect than the children I know. And as adults, we are the ones who are supposed to know how to show respect. How can children learn it if they are not seeing it being used?
and there are words
we don’t feel tired, nor think it’s strained, do you know why? Because we have all of you loving us!
Once you open natural peanut butter, it spoils quicker than other types of commercial peanut butter. A little trick she learned to help keep it fresher longer is to keep it in the refrigerator upside down. It will last up to four months that way.
I saw the sea turn black with sweet oil,
On this past weekend Don and I went to see a personal trainer to be properly fitted for athletic shoes.
To argue that one must leave one’s principles behind when the going gets tough is hardly a good argument. If you believe in something; if you think that you are correct in your theory, you must stick by those principles no matter how rough the going gets. In fact, I would argue that is the very time when you must stand by those principles; otherwise they have no meaning whatsoever.
These threats, repeatedly disseminated in "polite" form by Gonzales and others, were underscored through far cruder political discourse. The Family Research Council lead by James Dobson organized a series of events called "Justice Sunday" at which the federal judiciary was attacked and its total obeisance to the rule of the Bush Administration was demanded. These events attracted a broad array of senior Republican officials, including Majority Leader Frist, and the Administration's support to the functions was manifest. In the words of former Republican House Leader Dick Armey, the principal organizers of these events were "a band of thugs" and "nasty bullies." As Armey stated with reference to the Terri Schiavo affair, which also entailed broad attacks on the judiciary and was linked with the Justice Sunday events, "That was pure, blatant pandering to James Dobson. That’s all it was. It was silly, stupid, and irresponsible. Nobody serious about the Constitution would do that. But the question was will this energize our Christian conservative base for the next election.” But in addition to the electoral agenda, another aim was completely clear: the intimidation of judges.
For instance, if he was to go to Dobbies to buy kibble and then stop off for some nibbles on the way back, he would have to tell me he was going to the garden centre to buy dog food and then getting some corn-based snacks.
My husband : “Love the way he said to his sister “BODOHH! …” (which means stupid in Malay) at the mention of that we all laughed because we remembered his expression and the sound of his voice … so cheeky and full of mischief …hehee
“So,” she starts. “I think I’m breaking up with Jackson.”
Our house has always been full of books. There's at least one bookcase in every single room of our house, except for the bathroom (which has only a small pile of books instead of a whole bookcase!). The small library my family owns was collected over many years and from many different sources (book catalogs, stores, garage sales, library sales...). My parents are big into readers! Because of that, from the time I was in the womb, I was read to. And having always heard stories, as a young child I think it was fairly natural that I'd want to create some of my own stories as well. So I'd simply dictate them to my mother, who would very kindly write them down for me.
Speak easy on the grape vine
As an illuminated Bible this will provide a much needed freshness while reading the Gospels once again. This Bible is available in both cloth cover and genuine leather. This will be a great Bible to use while reading through the Gospels as a family or to set on your coffee table to use as an evangelistic tool as it will no doubt catch your friends attention.
So, what explains the growing gap? Mishel and Gee focus on three “wedges”: (a) an overall shift from labor income to capital income, (b) increasing inequality between top income recipients (such as CEOs and top earners in finance) and everyone else, and (c) the terms of trade, i.e., the faster price growth of things workers buy relative to what they produce.
So anyway, that is what happened. I now sport a bump on my head, the size of Texas.
If your little girl is about to turn another year older, then it’s time for you to get planning! Little girls’ birthday parties are the most fun. Your daughter’s birthday party is a time for you to make her feel like the absolute center of attention and a time for you to enjoy spoiling her a teeny bit on her special day. There’s nothing wrong with throwing a regular birthday party, but keeping the kids occupied is important and sometimes the structure of a theme can help you do that with ease. Here are a few tried and true girly party themes to consider.
That is what makes getting rid of stuff so easy now. My life if FULL and I do not have a need to fill it with anything. My new guy is frugal and thrifty and together we make a great couple financially.
Sanofi-Aventis 19
I put a pea-sized drop of glaze in the center of the paper square and then pushed the glass tile onto it. I highly recommend doing this on a non-stick craft sheet or some wax paper or something. I happen to have a small silicon baking sheet, found in the $1 aisle at my Target, which works really well for projects like this. If you get too heavy handed with the glaze, when you push the glass tile onto the paper (you want to PUSH not just PLACE it because you want to get as many air bubbles out as possible) sometimes you will squish a bit of glaze out the sides. Don't panic if you get a bit of glaze on the glass. It wipes off easily with a damp paper towel.
Preliminary work began in March with utility alterations on the construction site and completion is expected by fall 2013.
Reflections mirrored from within
But then I stumbled into a little store on Delancey called Lighting Craftsman. You know when a place looks not at all promising from the outside and then you walk in and your insides start screaming and freaking out and you're all ohmygoshohmygoshohmygosh under your breath? That's how I felt when I walked into this place that does all custom brass light fixtures.
1. Matt Barkley, USC – He’ll start the season as the top Heisman candidate.
It was all terribly depressing, and I was furiously angry that Broodie should achieve her fiftieth victory under such unworthy conditions. Some of the exhibitors put on a kind of swaggering bravado as if they were heroes to have come at all, and the judges carried out their responsible duties with an impatience and a carelessness that was a lasting disgrace.
To claim your prize, select the "Email Me" button from the right sidebar. Please put in the Subject Line "Prize Winner" and we will get your gift certificate to you for five (5) digis from Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps and More Fetish Digital Stamps and More.
Me: Laverne jumped off your magazines and they fell.
Alecina B. White, born in New York City, published a poetry collection called Little Folk Songs over 100 years ago. It included a short poem about squirrels which has been reprinted many times over the years, often without receiving proper author credit. Susan Luri, author and editor of R.L. Stine's best-selling Goosebumps series, wrote additional verses to White’s poem to create this charming story.
A bunny never makes a sound.
Mesh rollers are half way between Brush and Mag rollers in almost every way. Not a bad compromise.
It’s nice to be able to close matches because they are not at all what I want in a husband – and not feel guilty about closing the matches. I think that’s really cool. The scary thing is when a match I actually am attracted to keeps talking to me after multiple emails. I go into every conversation expecting it to end. So when it doesn’t end, it starts triggering insecurities in me that I did not realize I even had.
For the spirit of Christmas fulfills the greatest hunger of mankind. ~Loring A. Schuler
'I thought: “What is this place, what is a Londoner?”
Below you can enjoy some of the company's designs:
I read an article in the newest issue of Adbusters entitled “Hipster: the dead end of western civilization.” The article ironically used gritty hipsteresque photos of American Apparel-clad twenty-somethings as well as deft observations: “ten years ago a man wearing a plain V-neck tee and drinking a Pabst would never be accused of being a trend follower. But in 2008, such things have become shameless cliches…”
Pocket Flap:
He opens his first restaurant, Becco, in 1993, where he has the great idea of selling $6 bottles of wine for $15 — even though he admits he could get $18, the usual three-times markup. He figures he’ll make the difference on volume. He’s right.
Maybe one day scientists will include this awareness and this fundamental observation in their reports and recommendations. They already talk about it in their autobiographies, but these are considered at best separate from, at worst irrelevant or epiphenomenal to, their work.
It's been an amazing run.
Says the article:
It was a '55 Chevy pickup truck, which made it twenty years old, then: the same age as you. You called it turquoise, but it had faded to robin's-egg blue, with a net of fine cracks in the paintwork. A bench seat. You drove it with your left hand, except to shift. Then you took your arm from around my shoulders, and the purring coughed to a higher note, and you put your arm back again.
Using a mandoline or sharp knife, slice the freshly peeled sweet potato into 1/4 inch thick slices. Top half of the sweet potato slices with thinly sliced smoked Gruyère cheese and season with thyme and black pepper. Use the remaining slices to top the cheese covered sweet potato slices.
How long did it take you to write it?
It’s right there in the Dark Psychological Arts of the Ninja handbook…. page 21, paragraph 2…..
I set him free today.
Yes, eggs are an awesome staple to start your day. But say you're looking for something a little more fancy-pants. Indulgent, without being indulgent, you know what I mean? Enter the custard. I love making custard as a night-before project that has my breakfast ready-to-eat, no cooking, the next morning!
But what made me buy it is the FM modulator utility. I will be honest, when I got this thing Friday and hooked it up I was so excited. And it seemd to work really well. Scrolls the number of the person calling on the radio. Switched to music seamlessly. It was nice. But now its been 3 days of use. And here is what I have noticed:
I sometimes think of my world as currently being on hold. Is that just awful? I stated to some friends recently that I sometimes feel as if I am currently doing everything for my children and that there will come a time when I pick back up where I left off on me. I look at the mom with children in school and tell myself that's when it will be easier. I see people with fancy cars and perfect houses and tell myself that's when it will be easier. I think of having xxx amount of dollars in the bank and believe that will make it easier. And ultimately, convince myself that the magical mythical moment in which we have it all figured out and all in line, it will be easier.
At first, I was afraid to write the letter...where to start? What to say? But it was actually a lovely and sad moment, and I'm so glad and grateful that you guys suggested that I write to him.
I stepped out of their room and peered through Malatesta’s stairway to Triángulo’s space below. For the first time, there were no energy drinks in sight.
On a normal non-pregnant day I have a very very hot mouth, however, combination with pregnancy equals deadly. I really do need to learn how to calm down before I give myself high blood pressure at this late stage in pregnancy/early stage in life!
2 c. citron-type candied fruits (chopped fine)
It’s all full steam ahead at camp murdoch. This week marks the last few days I will be working where I am. friday will be the last day and it’s not coming soon enough. Then it’s two weeks of sorting shit out and getting ready to go traveling for months on end.
All I know is the timing is terrible and shocking that a company that is owed just over 10% of the total debt has managed to get us in administration.
Okay, enough whining. I'll be back when I'm back on top of things. Just wanted to check in and be honest about my journey through this. It's a good process, and I'm still grateful I've found it. But that doesn't make it easy. Still a long hard road. And I'm so ready to just be done, to just feel better again.
Four – Chris Pine is too old, DAMN. And no one else is quite right for me.
who moved across the waters,
Here is the press release for the event. Please leave any questions via comment and we will get back to you. Also, if you blog or have a website, feel free to copy and paste this info and help spread the word. You can NEVER have too many people to drink good beer with.
POETRY ON HORSBACK - OLIVER DIRKIN returns with his trusty nag, Ulysses, and an endless stream of crusty poems. Please don't feed the horse.
You make me sing like a guitar hummin'
I hope you have a wonderful, amazing day today, Mom.
October 2 - Was spent seeing the dinosaurs at the Natural History Museum! My son was enthralled with all those bones and artifacts. We left the museum and headed for Trafalgar Square (lots of construction, not allowed to feed the pigeons anymore), where we went to the National Gallery, the National Portrait Gallery, and then had a light snack at the Crypt at St. Martins. (Meanwhile, the Underground strike was on this day, so travel was by foot and cab) That evening we went to see Taiko Drummers at the Royal Festival Hall, which was absolutely incredible! Afterwards, we walked across the Thames on the pedestrian bridge, and it was just as we were crossing the bridge that Big Ben struck the hour, which just really etched a memory in my brain! The chill of the evening, the sound of the water under us, the lights of the old buildings lining the river, it was just breathtaking, with Big Ben adding to it all! We grabbed a pizza on the way back to the hotel for dinner, nothing special, just quick and easy. We were totally exhausted.
The first photo was a typical missionary-walking-away-from-the-camera shot. This one is really cool because of the reflection on the tracks....
Independence Brewing Co. wins 2012 Good Food Awards
Water- 2 cups
1 unconscious
3 discussion
Hey, there's always next time, though...The Cure, Austin Music Hall, June 8? Who's with me?
Just check out all this delicious food that we had!!!!!
The next hole in the ground, described in the book as a cave, features an ogre who can't even handle being hit on the head with a rock. His captive, a weak and soon dead goblin, is wearing the hammer handle on a necklace! Sweet! There's also a mystery box here containing a toxic gas, but I have nose filters, so I'm all good. I'd also be all good if I just held my nose with my fingers, but I guess people didn't do that back in the day? Or I had -2 fingers.
The twins are now 18-months old, and while the first year was grueling and exhausting, it was wonderful and amazing and I wouldn't trade it for anything! Twin A is the strong, silent type, loves books and watching his brother try things to see what the result will be before he jumps in. Twin B is our rough and tumble boy, who usually can be distinguished from his brother by his ready smile and various bruises on his face from daily experimentation with physics and gravity. Our other children are...
“This explains why press photographers and photojournalists were mainly targeted.”
The EPO's legal board of appeal has noted in a decision publised in the OJ that a decision not to refund 75% of the examination fees upon a withdrawal of the application has to be reasoned.
he rises to each occasion
Dennis Lehane is also the guest of honor at this year's Sleuthfest, and the following is an interview they did with him:
Romans 5:8-9
taller than the houses on the block.
Even though she’d been warned that such forthright feminism might kill her career, she never hesitated. Her bravery was rewarded with a decade-long run on the charts that make her one of the most successful Australians on the Hot 100. She also managed a successful acting career and never abandoned the activism that helped launch her success.
During the afternoon, the workers would set up the areas for dinners on the beach.
Services are alleged to be private. In lieu of flowers, the family requests that mourners make a donation to their favorite super PAC.
1 quart milk (divided)
What more if we had a moment– but quick as a single snap? Saturday afternoon, my friend and I decided to go to the canteen to grab some lunch after a 5-hour class with 30 mins.break. And you were there, sitting on the bench, as usual. And then we saw our common friends. They went with us. And you came. I was shocked of what you did. I was talking to them and you held my wrist then you told something to me (I’ll keep what he said for myself). “Ang bilis ng pangyayari” that’s what in my mind that time. They were so happy about what had happened. But I think that’s it. We started as friends, and will end as friends. I don’t want to expect more, for I know it will just hurt me more and more.
Now... let me backtrack to two days ago when Paul and I learned that Ethan had peed in the garbage can in the laundry room - where we put all the lint, candy bar wrappers, and other stuff we find in pockets...
It occurred to me then what an amazing imagination she has! When did my imagination go away? For the first time I realized that THAT was another part of loosing your childhood. What else do you lose as you leave childhood? Your sense of imagination. Your innocence. Your dreams to be whatever you want to be! It seems that all children at some point are astronauts, waiters, cooks, moms, dads, teachers, doctors, musicians, fire fighters, police, archeologists, museum experts, store owners, ice cream truck drivers, pro football players, baseball players, horse back riders, skiers, snow boarders, etc.
Dr. Marlowe's played by Bela, he has two helpers who kidnap the women motorists on a deserted road while he watches the whole thing on his state of the art surveilance device. Then, he can flip a switch that turns their car's motor off, stranding them!
I called him “Da.”
According to the HRC statistics, 21,000 people died in political violence in South Africa during apartheid - of whom 14,000 people died during the six-year transition process from 1990 to 1994. The book lists the number of incidents, dates, and those involved.
Both Bradley and Foster put an a great show! Sometimes the best concerts are those where its just a guy and his guitar. The voice takes center stage and reaches right into the soul.
Everybodys frienz - Bill Laswell, Anton Fier, Buckethead...
One of the issues facing the NTC is to secure munitions dumps and sites such as these. Hundreds of bombs and rockets are clearly visible through the broken wall; there is only razor-wire between the broken bits of wall and the main road. In some places the unexploded bombs are less than 30 feet from the road.
The only thing that matters
Cut them on the diagonal. Use a large skillet, melt the butter on medium heat and let the foam to subsides and then add the slices of plantains...fry on all sides until golden. Remove it to a plate and sprinkle sugar and cinnamon on top.
Note: It is at this point that you could change the size to custom sizes ...say if you wished to print onto a square card blank
Book cover: E29 & 31
Novalis Books
chicken (in the freezer) large red and green pepper (1 each)
Highlights – Decent three round fight. Tickle got chewed out for losing and not listening to his corner. It seemed a bit harsh given the guy was essentially out of the show now.
I soon arrived in the village, by this stage the wind had picked up and it was howling down this unassuming housing estate. Despite the village being a close knit community, this housing estate was quite new so the people on it kept themselves to themselves.
Sentiment is from Fiskars Birthday Sentiment Collection Stamp Set.....
When I got into line for the van ride to the hotel, it was jammed with more librarians and their accompanying identifying tote bags. And these weren't the "Ssssh!" types from the 50s. They were all swaying to the sounds of the jazz band playing beside baggage pickup!
Add into the roasting pan:
Melt butter and bouillon, slowly incorporate flour until smooth. Cook, stirring constantly for about one minute.
I know nothing of this sadness
The computer industry’s immediate need for integrated photonics involves getting data on and off chips, says Richard Otte, CEO of Silicon Valley chipmaker Promex Industries. Integrated photonics for connecting components on-chip is probably 10 years out, he says.
The thing that impresses me so much about this kid is his patience and spirit. It's a quality that can easily escape us as we age and get more jaded with time. However, this kid has such ingenuity and creativeness, I have no doubt in my mind that Caine will definitely be going places.
English was my best subject.
“Gentlemen, the King said assuredly, “he will not live long enough to try.”
The Extreme Cold
So give her some love people. I know how much it helps when people comment and give some encouragement!
I was once told I don’t look like a feminist. I asked, “What do you mean?” and the guy explained, “Well, you’re wearing feminine clothes and make-up!” Indeed, I wear make-up quite regularly and I take a long time to do my hair. I shave my legs and my armpits and I like to wear dresses. I don’t look masculine or even gender neutral. And that’s okay because feminism is not an effort to dispel gender differences. You don’t need to look like a man in order to support gender equality.
I only have a few more bits n pieces to buy now before I can really start...
26 hours have passed since I last ate, and I can truly tell you I am not hungry right now. I never thought I would say this after a fast, but it's true. Of course, I had cravings and was hungry throughout the day, but I made mental effort to prepare myself and I succeeded at enjoying the beginning of this cleanse.
Libraries are awesome. Any given library anywhere will always have a comprehensive collection of books on satanic practices for your perusal.
Due Date: Sunday, May 20, 11:59 PM (3 days)
Next month, CBC will air an extraordinary documenary called "Queen Elizabeth in 3D." It is only fitting that the subect of the first 3D documenary to be broadcast in Canada is The Queen of Canada. The documentary features colour 3D footage of The Queen's Coronation in 1953 as well as 3D footage shot during Her Majesty's most recent Canadian Homecoming. As an aside, yours truly also appears in the documentary...thankfully not in 3D.
Trapped in a lampshade
I’m only doing this for 10 days only though, then I plan to slowly incorporate solids in my diet such as raw veggies and fruits, smoothes..etc. I’m currently collecting a bunch of yummy raw food recipes for my transition :3.
What’s the one thing you really like that you’d really love to post about in your blog, but you don’t because it doesn’t really fit the overall theme?
He didn’t plunge him
3. We have to rethink our tax system more fundamentally. That one you don’t get until my next term. (Laughter and applause.)
The smells here are amazing and yet, not always pleasant! One minute it’s the smell of all the beautiful flowers and greenery that grows here. Then it’s the myriad of foods they cook here – curries and noodles and chicken and pork. The smell of cinammon is often found here. And then, there’s the smell of the street – garbage rotting and the always present smell of sewer water. And let’s not forget the dreaded durian fruit. You simply cannot describe the smell. The best I can say is that it’s a combination of sweaty socks, armpits, and possibly a hit of pineapple thrown in. It’s horrible! And yet, these people love this fruit…I can not bring myself to get it into my mouth! Sorry!
The ECHO spoke to eight of the 28 people whose signatures are on his nomination form. Of those, three said they definitely did not know they were signing for the BNP, while a fourth was adamant the signature on the form was not theirs.
We also have some young love this episode when a little girl with an allergic reaction is brought into the hospital. She is followed by a little boy who is in love with her and he had bought her chocolates not knowing that would spark her peanut allergy. The mothers, of course are going at it so the boy doesn’t get to stay with the girl until she waked up. In a huge case of generosity, Corev writes down everything the boy wants to say and he tells the girl when she wakes up.
Like, 40 boxes of work!
19 rue La Fontaine et 6 rue Moderne
And none of your convincing,
I've just started reading 'The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel' - so that will be given due attention, as well as a second reading of 'The Help' plus I have two other, unopened and unread books, bliss! The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel is a very funny book so far, and would imagine the film is the same - embarrassed Len by snorting out loud with laughter on the plane, several times :)
Date with Andrew 7:30 (he's so perfect. . . isn't he?)
Hugs love and an "Old School/Heirloom* Bus!"
Gregory: people don’t trust either party
Philippians 4:11-13 “I have learned to be content “strong and consistent” whatever the circumstances. 12 I know what it is to be in need, and I know what it is to have plenty. I have learned the secret of being content “strong and consistent” in any and every situation, whether well fed or hungry, whether living in plenty or in want. 13 I can do all this through him who gives me strength.”
Is there a book on this book blog, you ask? Sure. “Racing in the Street—The Springsteen Reader” is a collection of previous published essays about Springsteen’s influence. There are some solid essays here—album reviews, concert recaps, psychology, history, religion, analysis. Good stuff for a true devotee.
His Hindu friend agrees to swap places with him. But a few minutes later the same scene reoccurs. There is a knock on the door. "What's wrong?" the farmer asks. The Hindu holy man replies, "I, too, am grateful for your helping us out, but there is a cow in the barn. In my country cows are considered sacred and I can't sleep on holy ground!"
liberated; a strand of coral swaying to
I got all my work documents transferred from that PC to a public folder on the server and by Friday I never even needed to turn on the company-supplied PC. It was a rare breath of fresh air, a sense of moving forward into a new year with a newer way to work. Cleaner. Less clutter on my desk. I was even wondering whether I should box up the company PC and send it back or hang on to it as a backup just in case anything happened to my PC down the road.
Local American consulate officials were invited to the Halloween party, an all-American date, at the mansion of a young Saudi prince in Jeddah. The prince’s name was omitted from the document, as the diplomats themselves acknowledge that their names should be withheld. The only clue is that this Prince belongs to the Al Thunayan huge family.
I first attended San Diego Comic Con to promote my work in 2000. I walked around with the tour of fiends promoting the release of my first book Monster Museum and passed out postcards and stickers. I had my first booth in 2001 and grew from there. I feel proud to look at my humble beginnings (10x10 booth with one book and one shirt) to the MCP mega store that I ended on in 2009 (10x20 booth with 40 shirts, 18 books, prints, buckles, stickers, DVDs, CDs, and more). It was a fun and memorial decade at the con.
“…calls to mind the youthful focus of Robert Heinlein’s early military sf, as well as the excitement of space opera epitomized by the many Star Wars novels. Fast-paced military action and a youthful protagonist make this a good choice for both young adult and adult fans of space wars.” - Library Journal
They probably seem like they'd be really complicated, but they're not actually that hard to make at home, especially if you follow this recipe from expert-at-everything Alton Brown. We've made several batches, and have had stellar results every time. Do yourself a huge favor and try them this weekend! And sorry they're aren't any pictures of a huge pile of sugary doughnuts; they never seem to stick around long enough to be photographed!
Who are we getting reservations at a place on a night where Bobby Flay & Michael Symon are enjoying the same menu?
It’s not often that I have anything good to say about Greene King, but credit where credit is due.
Frank Martin and everything about him reminded me of Bean Bandit from the classic "Gunsmith Cats" graphic novels, and the film felt like an unauthorized live-action version of a Bean Bandit adventure. That character, too, is a hard-bitten rogue with his own never-compromised code of honor, drives a ultra-costumized car, will deliver anything anywhere against any odds, and can kick the ass of those he can't outdrive. In every detail that matters, Frank Martin is Bean Bandit. And like "Gunsmith Cats," this movie is more concerned about guns, fast cars, and action than about tight story logic.
Their spendthrift policy offers a marked contrast to that pursued by Arsenal. Whilst the Liverpudlian model is not vindication of that pursued by Arsenal, it certainly underlines that the recklessness of some demands for signings is not a guarantee of success were they to be followed. It is about quality and this squad can be improved – every squad can – but any future success is not going to be bought by spending without thought or consideration given to where the genuine weaknesses lie.
2. "Come on. It will be very. The note will give her shower-nozzle masturbation material for weeks."
A third party. Smoothing over.
I tried my best to capture a picture, but when you're in the car that's kind of hard! (Don't worry, Mom-- I only snapped the photos at stoplights!). This was the best I could do, and it does absolutely no justice for the incredible beauty of those 2 rainbows...especially because you can only see one of them!
While sitting opposite my psychiatrist, waiting patiently for my prescriptions, I mentioned “You know I have BPD, right?” She looked at me and said, “I don’t think so, I’ve never seen it.” I went down the list of symptoms and behaviors that fit. She said in a hushed tone “Were you abused as a child?” I thought for a moment and said “No, I was never hit. But I still think I have BPD.” She said “Well, then you probably do and you need to heal yourself.”
Nowadays it would be unthinkable and down right irresponsible to fan the flames of a foreign ethnic war in order to boost attendance at a sporting event. Could you imagine a modern-day highly publicised Jewish-Palestinian pitching showdown between the Columbus Clippers and the Buffalo Bisons? In 1932 it wasn't insensitive but damn good business and the newspapers played along doing all they could to sell some extra papers in the waning days of the baseball season. Besides the Oakland and Sacramento papers, news of the Sino-Japanese showdown was carried nationwide. Nushida seems to have remained silent on the whole thing but the newly named Lee Gum Hong shot his mouth off like a proto Mohammad Ali telling sports writers "this is a battle between nations. I represent China and Nushida represents Japan. And China shall win."
Lack of effort in proactive activities – the vast majority of the profiles I researched were present in many groups, some even managing their own, yet rarely created content or put in the effort to really use LinkedIn’s key features for business means. Some of the profiles didn’t even know the value in the ‘Answers’ section…
2-3 T olive oil drizzled on a griddle
I met Joel, Stephanie and "Baby Joel" (as he is called) this past summer when I went to Joanne's granddaughter's birthday party. I had never met anybody who lived in the bungalows out in the Rockaways. I went about 30 blocks away from my usual location at 116th Street in Rockaway Park. I hope to continue photographing them and other people living in the bungalows during the next year.
knew about this and what is wrong with people?
4) To build links with Palestinian universities.
PS: Best Youtube comment comes close: “Kid’s got so much swag its leaking from his nose”
- I wish I was as successful as some of the people I went to college with.
Vartianen H. Effects of psychosocial factors, especially work-related stress, on fertility and pregnancy. A prospective study from the stage of planning to become pregnant. Acta Obstet Gynecol Scand 1990; 69: 677-678.
The first is the Coalition for Justice for Levi, a campaign that I have been helping with since 2009. In the summer of that year, Levi Schaeffer, a member of the community in Peterborough, Ontario (where I was a nursing school student) was fatally shot by the O.P.P. in Pickle Lake, Ontario. In the time after Levi passed, his family was unable to ascertain exactly what happened to him in great part because the Officers involved did not submit clear and contemporaneous notes from which the Special Investigations Unit ( a civilian led body that investigates situations of force involving police officers ) could draw conclusive evidence. The pain of not being able to find out what happened to their son and brother caused the Schaeffer family to join with the family of Douglas Minty, another Ontario Resident who was shot with similar results, to start the long procedure of changing legislation of how police react in such situations, specifically that the decision be taken that they are not allowed to have their notes vetted by O.P.P.A. lawyers before being submitted. In November of 2011 there was a unanimous decision made at the Supreme court of Ontario that in fact supported this legislation. It was truly a victorious moment for the Coalition. Since then, however, the O.P.P. has appealed this decision, and so the process continues, and support is still needed. To find out more about the Coalition for Justice for
Rock 'n' Roll Grrrl by Ditch Bank Okies
Now then, if you could know the exact makeup of every surface of the die (not just the six obvious sides of the die, but the positioning of each atom), and also the makeup of the surface it will be landing on, as well as the rotation of the die, minor air currents, air temperature, lighting, various other substances on the die (sweat, skin, etc), and a number of other variables I’m not thinking of right now, you would be able to predict, with 100% accuracy, the result of the roll.
I believe in email chains about bachelor parties, summer road trips and the coming weekend’s betting prospectus.
“Of course she did.” My daughter said—with anger clearly in her voice. “ Her mother said she had to.”
This boy is from a poor working class family.
Synonyms for Huge
We are driven to move fast, folks are counting on us.
15. Vera (1:16)
3 bottles of Pinot
This diet can work, four million French people have bought the book and I have seen the results on my French friends. Will they keep the weight off? I think that depends very much on how long they continue to follow the maintenance regime...Once the pounds have dropped off it is recommended that for one day a week protein-only is the plate of choice.
I try not to inflict my dreams on others. Thus, I beg your forbearance for what follows. I plead as an excuse that the dream is relevant only insofar as it relates to a poem by Christina Rossetti.
Now I live in Santa Cruz California, so I’ll head to one of the local beaches or along the cliffs overlooking the ocean where the surfers ride the waves. A person may catch my eye, or a building I’ve never really paid attention to before. My mind will either catalog that image or whatever the people might be doing as I continue to walk. As I continue I might start weaving those elements into a new scene, perhaps one I can use right away. If I can’t I slowly start to see a path where I can take the story next to reach that scene that’s unfolding inside my mind where important information or the introduction of a new danger can take place.
A few months ago, I discovered a wonderful company, Dayspring and instantly fell in love with their inspirational home decor and gifts! So when I was given the opportunity to review a few items from their new Redeemed collection, I jumped at the chance!
The two axes in this approach are the attractiveness of the market and the competitive position of the product line. Where a particular product line falls along these axes is determined by an analysis of that product line and its market, using the following criteria:
and a great big bear with wings.
Williams said the victim, a white female, entered the back of the bus, and was told she would have to stand. Deputies said she was then hit by a shoe.
Cardi: JCrew, thrifted
Don't have any Touch Twin markers? That's OK too... for now. Starting in January we
I just finished reading an interview with a college student who turned off all of his social media outlets (including e-mail and YouTube) and his phone for 90 days in favor of enjoying the simple realities around him.
Lola: I do believe in Heaven, only because it looks like you fell from there! Ohhhhh. Do you believe in past lives? Possession? Water Retention?
Well, Tuesday was my 23rd birthday. Wow. Sometimes I feel older than I really am... even got the gray hair to prove it sometimes. Brendon had called and he wished he could have gotten me something, but honestly, all I want from him is just to be safe.
Sir Mathew Pinsent the absolute legend of rowing that is the man who won gold at the 1992, 1996, 2000 and 2004 Olympics for team GB and an absolute hero of mine was the first to get back to me saying that routine and superstitions are a “nightmare” for rowers. Due to the technical nature of the sport.
In the end, these properties of God, given to us in revelation from God, form a coordinate and holistic picture that reveals, in perspective, the perfect and unchanging character of God; a character that we learn, recognize, and come to know in Jesus Christ, who is God, speaking for Himself, in the flesh.
This is one of the great groups that I never got to see in concert. I am a big Steve Perry fan and would not want to see the group without Perry.
Ferros, on the other hand, used the party’s stock of magic arrows to fire at the creature again and again and finally managed to put one arrow through its throat. It dropped the bone hook, was gripped by convulsions and its withered skin turned to dust before its skeleton shattered into a thousand bony fragments. Ferros’ player was informed that he could add the title “Devil-Slayer” to his character sheet. The Bone Devil, for such it was, had been despatched but the party’s quest was not yet over as they still had the crystal to find. Sure enough, further up the passage, they came to a room where a large chest was pushed against one wall. It had three locks and both Elysia and Ferros surmised that the gold, silver and platinum keys might unlock them. Unfortunately, they found that the keys were entirely the wrong size. Reluctant to disturb the chest with any physical damage, they Enlarged Relic, sent him off to bring Zanurax back and put the thief to good use opening the locks. He managed to get the first one open, whereupon the second and third began to tick ominously. He moved on to Number Two and all he got was a face full of poisonous gas but he managed to hold his breath until it had dissipated. The third lock delivered a dose of paralysing gas but this too had no effect on the doughty thief.
If only- one teeny tiny decision- here instead of there, and this would have been $34, or perhaps even free. And despite my efforts, it is my fault. I feel like I am robbing my family.
Amnesty International’s “10 Basic Human Rights Standards for Law Enforcement Officials” states that the use of force should be avoided in dispersing a peaceful/non-violent assembly. We reiterate that law enforcement officials owe a duty to protect the participants of a peaceful assembly. UN’s Code of Conduct for Law Enforcement Officials further states that law enforcers may not inflict any act of torture or cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment nor invoke superior orders or exceptional circumstances such as national security or political instability as justification for torture or cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment.
I can't decide if my favorite is the 'Clear Cuts' acetate sentiment 'Happy'
Mr Silva told the paper: ‘It is necessary, and I want to hear it from the White House.
Because I was lazy lately, I didn't have patience to stamp all my nails so many times, so I decided to try them out but as an accent nails. First pattern I used was a cheetah pattern from CK-03 over How About a Tumble with Wet n Wild - Black Créme. I had to stamp twice my ring finger and tree times my thumb to cover the whole nail. The pattern transfered to the stamper really great so I didn't have any problems with this plate.
Columbus KL, Gold Level, East Tower, Hyatt Regency Chicago
Halleluiah! Long live rock n roll!
In the evening John was dashing out to take part in a pub quiz and Derek to the cinema to see A Week With Marilyn so we had a quick pasta dish made with the remains of the sauce from the Spanish chicken dish – we told you we don’t waste anything!
So that is my argument for these socks. If you live in Atlanta, stop by Abbadabba's and pick some up. If you don't live in Atlanta, pick some up from Nordstrom. I wear a size 9.5 shoe and the large works for me, but if your feet are much larger they may not be work for you. You can also check out Mocc Socks, which are similar, and marketed towards men, though I cannot attest to their quality or ability to stay up.
Dark and Disorderly is Lillie St. Claire’s story. Lillie is a Talent with the ability to dispatch ghosts. She also happens to be recently widowed, and now her dead husband’s out to get her. When not dispelling ghosts for the city (her day job), Lillie is trying to figure out who’s using her dead husband to get to her, with some help from a federal agent, John Thresher.
You're almost there. Now...is your novel ready? Have you applied all this hard won improvement to the novel itself? It does you no good to have an enticing query if your novel is still last year's writing.
I even remembered my camera, and remembered to take pictures I just can't download them now. The daily life of a shop owner is always challenging.
I love living in a small town! Speaking of which, a local Italian restaurant opened yesterday and we tried it out! I love our small town, and I love supporting small business! Here are some sweet pics of Sweetpea at that restaurant. :)
May 30, 2010 Warnings and reports are flooding in from a large variety of security sources – all warning that South African intelligence services were ‘slow to react” to the many warnings of terror threats to the 2010 World Cup. The Sunday Times reported this week’s briefing to the US Congress counter-terror caucus warning of plans that ‘several World Cup 2010 venues will be targeted, some simultaneously, others at random'.
Few would including the friends she hangs out with! While she gets in she is still conscious of the damage to the ego of young men and women who want to fit it and Abhors the bullying…
What: Forum to Discuss Planned Proposed Phase-Out of MS 571 by the DOE
“When something came from nothing, was it a big YES? A big NO? Or a big NEUTRAL?”
But Brizard must make this a top priority because he needs teachers and the community on his side if his reform efforts are to be successful. Many of those reforms, such as how teachers are evaluated and paid, are controversial.
He sees Jesus as very much alive in a new, wonderful, radiant sort of life in some different dimension beyond death.
I knew this week and next week would be hard. Without a vacation to distract me, I know it's going to feel even longer. And of course there's mothers day... But first tomorrow we have our second to last appointment with the RE and several blood draws. I am going to miss my weekly appointments (and ultrasounds!) but our OB will see us every other week and we will have an ultrasound every other appointment until 24 weeks when we will reevaluate. I was telling my husband that sometimes our current medical treatment feels a bit like being in the high roller club at a casino chain. It sucks to get there, and the losses will never ever make up for the perks, but since we're here anyway, the perks really are amazing. I cringe remembering my phone calls at the end of my last pregnant with my old OB and how confidently she told me everything was fine and I had nothing to worry about and it was all in my head... I can't imagine that from my current doctor. It brings me comfort to know that no matter what happens, we are doing the absolute best we can for our baby.
You will proceed through Passport Control and claim your baggage at the new international terminal.
** To be sure there are other very fine sites out there. If there is one in particular that I didn’t mention that you think is worth knowing about, please let me know in the comments section. Maybe I’ll come up with an “honorable mention” category. In the mean time, click here to check out the ones that I didn’t mention.
Ashtavakra teaches us that meditation enhances the feeling of dvaita – us and God and it is counter-productive. It implies that you are bound and bound shall you stay. Since it has been said forever – “you are free of you think you are free and bound if you think you are bound”. Thus we see that patanjali does not subscribe to aSTAvakra’s teaching. According to patanjali, you have to practice the eight part yOga system to even approach samAdhi of which there are many kinds – the temporary, the mind-destroying and the natural.
An outcast from an isolated religious settlement in the Caribbean (Mathews) is tricked by pirates into leading them to the community. While Captain LaRouche (Lee) and his chief henchmen (Arne and Ripper) lead a campaign of terror against the settlers, and the outcast tries to convince his father (Keir) to reveal where the secret treasure the pirates are after is hidden, his best friend (Corbitt) and sister (Landi) are planning a guerilla war against the invaders.
and it was just quiet.
Starring- Amber Heard, Karl Urban & Odette Yustman
Thanks again for stopping by and blessings on your weekend.
Note: Don't let your anger get out of hand. You may start to become angry at things that have no fault whatsoever.
Post in the combox, and I can reply there or make a new post if there is a ton to say. You are also welcome e-mail me (let me know who you are), and if you do, let me know whether the text of your question is bloggable.
Now for some inspiration for the Design Team, please do pop along to their individual blogs and share some love..................................
in warm months when the pines on the hill
At the moment Mugsy is staying at my parents house. My mom and dad have kindly offered to give him a home until we can find a permanent home. I've had some interest, but I'm being cautious since I've had a few folks change their mind on me so far. Earlier this week me and my mom took the Mugster to the vet to get some bloodwork and full check up to make sure that he is healthy to be adopted. His bloodwork came back negative and he was pronounced healthy. The vet estimated his age to be between 3 and 5 and as I suspected, he was neutered. Mugsy was a big hit at the animal hospital, the staff loved him and offered to help us find a home for him. I need to take him back in 3 weeks for an updated vaccine, but he's doing really great.
This belief about multiculturalism and immigration is a mainstream belief amongst many people throughout the UK and that belief does not equate to supporting or endorsing Anders Breivik.
The devil makes work for idle hands is so very true of our politicians. With over 70% of our laws coming from our European Union masters there has been no decrease in the number of conmen in the House of Commons. Indeed we now have many more politicians and bureaucrats mithering and bullying us than we ever had when we had the world's greatest empire.
“Okay.” I feel amused, annoyed, and doubtful.
the reasons we bled,
This set of a Sea Beanie and Paula's Scarfette was knitted for Sophie to give to her Mum for Mother's Day. It is knitted in 100Purewool and was very hard to post to Sophie without me keeping it for myself.
SEC EAST
It's a fat quarter bundle from the Mini Mike's Collection of Michael Miller... I really love these tiny prints! I was trying to pick a favorite, but I really can't because they're all so sweet.
Morley South
You got to know the characters more and see how they've changed since the beginning of the series. More characters get involved and pieces slowly start make sense as they're pieced together. Michael Grant has the ability to give you an inside on what everyone is thinking but also shock you at the same time. For example, there were some events that happened and I was shocked but the characters were clueless even after I pieced the pieces together. I can't wait to get to the next book in the series, Lies and find out more about FAYZ and the characters. If you haven't read any of these books, I suggest you pick them up and read them.
Release date April 24, 2012 on Epic Records
I love that Thanksgiving symbolizes being together with those you love sharing the bountiful harvest of the summer and fall crops. What better way to decorate your mantle, counter, or table, than with a collection of words describing Thanksgiving? (And seriously--the plate was less than $5 at Walmart and the vinyl took less than 5 minutes to apply--can you beat that?!)
We are SO GRATEFUL to them.
The wife and I did some ‘official’ Flying Pig training this morning, tackling the tricky hills and roads in Eden Park, racking up almost 6 miles in the process.
Dave May - .330 with 17 homers and 56 RBI's.
*From July 8th, 2010 onward, civil unrest will take place, possibly driven by food prices skyrocketing and the devaluation of the dollar.
Barely prevented from being my first score in the 50s only due to the use of First Kiss in the finale, which reminded me how good the series could be at times. Ignoring how Saito could return to the world without magic, his return was very well-handled. The finale itself was good, but the rest of the series (minus episode 3) ranged from “I can’t believe I’m watching this” to “How did this series get so bad?” Outside of jealousy, Louise was an entirely different character in this series compared to the seasons before. Siesta was non-existant and Tabitha had little to no reason for being around other than to appease fans. The third episode truly felt like it should have been the finale for the rest of the series. I’m just thankful no more episodes will come.
So I began studying the science of gluten-free baking and it really is a science. Unlike regular flour, you can't just choose one gluten-free flour and start baking. There are formulas for how to mix different flours to get the right taste and texture and then you have to know how to add other ingredients to replace the qualities of gluten.
vs Buffalo Bills-7:00pm-August 30, 2012
The terrifying round-about where I learned to drive is quiet and civilised, scarcely the life threatening, multi-laned, Piccadilly Circus of my memory. My former primary school St Pauls’ is still small and neat, but my childhood home is unrecognisable - some idiot chopped down the huge weeping willow that was the best thing about it. My secondary school has been demolished - perhaps to bury its poor reputation and behind every building lurks another, painted a different colour, housing a different family.
I know, I've been MIA...what's new, right? Well...here's one of the many reasons why!
Rarely reviews, because I don’t read the papers enough. But recommendations will point me to a book which I will then browse through.
Papers - Tea Time Simply Scrappin', Neutrals & Regals Collections 12" x
They don't know evil or jealousy or discontent.
job telling about the ottoman empire and dracula
There I am Friday, getting fingerprinted by Migracion in Cancun. Finally! Because I was 2 days late applying for my visa renweal, it inexplicably took 5 months to get the visa!
Anyway, I was going to post a cake today but have changed my mind for 2 reasons.
My card is an A2 size card. I used kraft card stock for the base. The lettering was done on my computer using a font called LDJ Happy Tails, I do not remember what size font it was. I also used clip art for the doggie toys. The paper is DCWV and some I printed using the Imagine. :)
Have fun making cards and come visit me today if you're in Savannah!
Series laptops of Apple Computer, Apple Power Books, was launched in 1991. This is the de facto standard laptops that continue to survive until now. This can be seen on the placement of the keyboard, the availability of the palm rest, and trackball. The next Power Series Books for the first time using the display to 256 colors (Power Books output 165c-1993), touchpad, and 16-bit voice recorder. In addition, there are Ethernet Network Adapter (Power Books 500 series output in 1994).
2 tbsp all natural peanut butter
Oh, get your money out
3-4 ripe bananas, mashed
Hasbro is a branded play company providing children and families around the world with a wide-range of immersive entertainment offerings based on the Company’s world class brand portfolio. From toys and games, to television programming, motion pictures, video games and a comprehensive licensing program, Hasbro strives to delight its customers through the strategic leveraging of well-known and beloved brands such as TRANSFORMERS, LITTLEST PET SHOP, NERF, PLAYSKOOL, MY LITTLE PONY, G.I. JOE, MAGIC: THE GATHERING and MONOPOLY.
Our new next-door neighbors have moved in, I think, because this morning there were two cars in the driveway. They were supposed to move in last night but I never heard a peep nor saw any sign of a moving truck (not that I was spying out the window all evening or anything)(for reals, the only window in our house that faces their house is the one over the toilet in the master bath, so no). I'm guessing they are the quietest movers EVER and now I can never move again because we make a lot of noise and block up the entire street for days when we move, OMG. I am retroactively embarrassed for us now.
The weekend just past saw the fifth 2D Comics Festival in Derry, Northern Ireland. I was there for the fourth time, my third as an exhibitor, and my first with my name in the programme.
I am THAT Dad. Still.
For a third disbursement, of $30 million in city funds, things would get more complicated--and potentially challenging.
Best thing about being a writer is freedom to express yourself once you’ve got a character up and running and finding that it’s caught fire with the reader. And when you’re writing a novel, you sit down and look at the blank page of the next chapter and it feels as though these characters you’ve created are waiting to see what they’re going to do next. My characters are very real to me and I love living with them! I don’t have a worst thing about being a writer. I love everything about it, because creating characters and storylines is what makes me tick. I’d have nowhere to go in my life if I didn’t write. Sad, but true!
Hmmm, perhaps I should have changed my name to Charles something or other…
I so wanted that fabric. My eyes swept along the table, piled high with dozens of boxes, and also crockery and glass ware, the sort of strange mix you only see at these country brocante fairs.
Send me your light
In any case, I'm staying away from my mother. Husband has been to see her a couple of times, to take her her mail that came here - Christmas and belated birthday cards - and to bring me her dirty laundry. (The home will do her laundry, but she has sensitive skin, and itches, so I wash it in "Free and Clear" type detergent.
4. Once you finish reciting raise your hands up to the ears, saying “Allahu Akbar.” Bow (your hands on your knees, back straight, your face toward the ground, saying three times, “Subhana rabbiyal adheem” (Glory be to my Lord Almighty). This position is called (ruku’).
TTC picked Peter with our hearts AND brains!
Or Gerda following Little Ray,
Aria learned Turkish a lot. He is not good at as much as English yet. Anyway, a huge hug and kisses from me and Aria to you all guys.
3 Tbsp soy sauce
We had lots of empty boxes, parcel tape and good intentions. This is all we had until we decided to make a start and pack away our ridiculously over sized collection of books. Now all we have is a living room full of boxes and some empty bookcases.
Government agencies are your only choice in some things and they know it. These agencies do not posses the urge to improve their service because the government knows that the citizens have no other choice, the citizens just have to deal with it. And even if they did have the urge the improve, it’s not that strong compared to private entities because they know that there’s no competition, they have the monopoly, people cannot simply turn to others simply because there is no other option for them. And with accountability, just think of the rampant corruption in the government and ask yourself if the state has any. So how does Anarchy sound?
I weep for the future of PNG sometimes.
Two years ago, not long after we first moved in together, we decided we wanted some pet rats. I have wanted rats for years but because we’d had every animal under the sun as a child, my mum had said “If you want any more pets, you should wait until you move out”. So I did.
Day 27: Share a picture.
Christian McKay, Me and Orson Welles
Even if that doesn't ring true
$79.95 plus shipping $5.85
And amongst all this negativity, with the possible exception of the ICG (of which more later), I didn’t see anyone leaping forward with much in the way of constructive ideas for the future. Five years ago we were awash with shiny new plans and strategies. Perhaps that was one of the problems…
Last night, I was diagnosed. Bone cancer. The prognosis wasn't good. I started chemo right away. My hair began to fall out. I considered short haircuts to ease the progression to full-on baldness. Two friends from my writing workshop were there. A friend from work. My mother.
Hallie's going to need Boyd, her friends, and all the ghosts she can find to defeat an enemy who has an unimaginable ancient power at his command.
But it was only a few short months ago that wasn’t the case.
_Dafnis Prieto, 37, New York. Jazz percussionist and composer with classical training and Afro-Cuban musical heritage.
Those are the break. Windows is shutting down.
This motivates them to sell work to publishers, not sit on their thumbs collecting checks from writers. "In the event of a sale?" Yes, I'm sure a sale IS quite an event for this outfit! There's no evidence you've ever had one.
And as the years passed, people would mention that girl I met at UVA. Did you hear she's a writer with Saturday Night Live? Did you see that first Weekend Update episode? She's writing a movie now, and I think she's even in it! She's got her own TV show - didn't you know her back at school? Yes, yes, and yes. And fuck you very much for mentioning it.
The heart of King’s argument has been made before – in fact, not too long ago in an article on Cracked.com, author David Wong mentioned ‘Six Things Rich People Need to Stop Saying‘, and they’re more or less the same things King is tired of hearing from his rich friends. In one section, about the fat-cat claim that receiving handouts is downright un-American, Wong points out:
Not that long ago Goldman Sachs (NYSE:GS) forced Warren Buffett (NYSE:BRK.A) out of his life saving $5 Billion preferred share convertible deal. Goldman thought it was too expensive and you have to admit the calculations at the time looked a little pricey. Warren Buffett was probably prepared to sit on it and yield some 10% for quite some time. Wondering if Buffett’s will had instructions as to what to do with the position if he passed away.
♥ Easy to adapt to many uses, or dismantle and move somewhere else.
My Islam is Jesus breaking bread at passover
Hit the beach
So, do you guys feel that you finally understand what voice is? Do you have questions? What are your thoughts? Your suggestions? Do you think people are born with their natural voice? Or do you feel life experience shapes voice? If we don’t have a voice can we develop one? Do you believe there are “tone deaf” writers who will never improve no matter how much teaching?
It’s Easy–Weezer
"The alliance is not a bargaining chamber and we are not going to say we want this or we will walk away.
I'd post pictures but I think this pretty much
Perhaps one of the most breathtaking is the trail up Monte San Primo. You'll transfer up to a height of 1,000 m before walking to a saddle at 1,400 m. Staggering 270 degree views will greet you upon your arrival, while the 2,400 m La Grigne towers above you. You'll have an amazing experience on the return leg too, by visiting a cliff-side bar in the village of Ghisallo, situated around 750 m below the saddle.
Maybe something from Gaps pregnancy range, for surely as Diana I could become pregnant?
23 Liquor Store
Edwin Gillette, assistant to Sturges from 1937 - 1942, recalled that his boss loved to "play around" and "be the great raconteur, but he had to work to get the money to enjoy himself." With or without the money, Sturges was a profligate spender. His engineering company was sold after the war with proceeds going to the IRS. He was able to hold onto The Players until 1953 when the government put a lien on its income, auctioned off its contents and finally sold it to cover taxes and debts. Sturges lived six more years and died just before his 61st birthday while working on his memoirs at the Algonquin Hotel in New York. Coincidentally, two months earlier The Garden of Allah in Hollywood had been demolished.
There are two things about these seven letters that repeat in each letter. I learn by seeing patterns and common things, so this jumped out at me. Also, it’s generally accepted that if something happens more than once in the Bible, it’s best to pay attention to it.
No one left and no one came
Do not underestimate Al's burrito consumption skills.
I am deeply moved by how it all happened – how bad things felt, the amazing things that followed, and how the good could not have happen without the bad. Looking back, everything was preparing us for moving out of the country, it was all building momentum to that moment we decided to move to Costa Rica.
The incident has made headlines acrosss China, including on the popular news sites Sina News and the English language Shanghai Daily.
And I'd impulse bought this handpainted pig (this is a style I love, but can't reasonably incorporate inside. No such excuse outside!) from TJ Maxx a couple of weeks ago. James likes to pat it:
Obviously, I'm not suggesting you go round sucking your thumb or making cooing baby noises, but we can still think about ways to make our faces soft, open, friendly, and happy, when we want to influence people in our direction.
Every day there must be a hundred things you notice and you would like to tweak or improve in your house. If you ever bothered to make a list of those must-do or would-like-to-do projects you would have noticed that the things you needed could be found in the hardware, the electronics shop, the pet shop, the garden supplies shop, the automotive shop and some others. It used to be that you needed to make a round of neighborhood stores to get what you needed for your home. Now, that is no longer the case.
While the Jets never arrived in Minnesota, moving instead to Phoenix, the deal was already in place to send the Moose north to Winnipeg, where they were renamed the Manitoba Moose.
Gervinho had been causing problems with the directness of his running and twice spurned decent opportunities. If he could add the calmness he showed against Mali for his country, then it is but a short step to twenty goals per season. As it is, his recent appearances hint at returning to the consistency which was rudely interrupted in Winter.
It is important for brands to have fans and advocates.
The man in the brown suit patted me on the back, half reassuringly, half in an attempt to make me stop looking for the room that wasn’t there anymore.
Genres : Thriller
This is an article I recently wrote for my synodical Bishop about planning at the church I currently serve. He recently used it for an article he wrote that went out in our synod’s “Connections” E-Newsletter.
The designs and style of closets depend on your choice, you can find closet designs made of wood, plastic or even steel. If you have a good budget and interested in the beautiful wood closets designs then you might be interested in the closet designs made from different woods like maple, mahogany, pine etc. and if you like it light then you can as easily buy closet designs made of plastic, wire or metal.
4.- Let’s Go - Produced by Tonedeff
Some of my fellow metaphorically-minded religious folks would see in that proof that Satan is a beguiler, that the things that ultimately consume us are hidden in lovely packages. I, on the other hand, began an extended meditation on how even the weeds, the least among flowers, are beautiful and valuable. Quite a difference.
Because I love you
We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles, Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law, but by the faith of Jesus Christ, even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for by the works of the law shall no flesh be justified. But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves also are found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God forbid. For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor. For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God. I am crucified with Christ: nevertheless I live; yet not I, but Christ liveth in me: and the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me. I do not frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead in vain.
And then came another dark time of anxiety and feeling overwhelmed- when he worked so hard but did not see progress, or simply became discouraged facing school all the time. It was also a dark time of year as we neared Christmas. He was cranky and uncooperative with everybody that year.
Life is, as I mentioned above, seriously messy. But at least some of the mess is delicious. The rest...I'll tell you about it when that groundhog heads back under into his hole like the rest of us.
Housewife, verdict and indict.
This is a brilliant post by John Hope Bryant, that clearly expresses the sentiment that if African Americans had a Bill Gates-type-entrepreneurial role model then the vision for the Black community would not be limited to a mindset of ‘only the lucky get out’, and the ‘victory’ would not be narrowed to simply having a ‘Black President”.
This book however, is somewhat darker in tone than those which precede it. Questions are raised not only about Montalbano’s ability to do his job, but also whether his health is all it should be. The nature of the enquiry – into the illegal trafficking of immigrants, and specifically children – takes the reader into an uncomfortable area. None of this is a critcism however; this series tends to get better with every book, and this is possibly my favourite so far.
Faku was mentioned in the Kabuso forensic report into municipal land sales and tenders, commissioned by the provincial local government and traditional affairs department.
The next morning, I checked my blog for comments and hits and I was surprised to find, instead of the usual 20-30ish hits this early, I was already well over a hundred. By the time I started work, it had creeped up a bit more.
Boycott ARLA, IKEA, GRUNDFOSS , and other companies which betrayed the values of the West...
The biggest response to The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo so far has been overwhelming praise for Rooney Mara. Her performance is indeed excellent in the way that Noomi Repace’s performance was excellent in the Swedish version. Both are excellent portraits of a woman against the world. Mara’s performance is different though, her movements and nuances are all her own and she creates her own version of Lisbeth. That Lisbeth may not be worlds apart from Repace’s but it is enough to admire the performance that shows up on screen. The rest of the cast is strong with a great supporting performance from Stellan Skarsgard and a great lead performance by Daniel Craig. Craig was the perfect man for this role. He is tough when he needs to be and vulnerable the rest of the time. Craig isn’t overshadowed by Mara but sort of compliments her performance. He is the most relatable character and he suits the purpose well.
In this Super Earthling Life Lesson you learned valuable information about the inner workings of the male brain; that male thoughts are skewed and populated with strange, WTF ideas that have absolutely nothing to do with anything females might consider sound, logical or rational--but make perfect sense to the male; and you learned how to gleefully exact vengeance by following your spouse’s instructions to the letter and creating the avatar of his choosing after he laughs at you and your blog. Finally, you learned that if you have to go to Hell because you’ve dutifully obeyed your spouse, to make damn sure he’s right there in the handbasket with you.
The lawsuit, which names ABC and Mike Fleiss, executive producer of the two programs, claims the dating shows have never featured a person of color in the central role of deciding who, among the season’s lineup of dates, is the winning choice as a potential mate.
I always wake up terrified from this dream. I’ve dreamt about this specific apartment a few times now in maybe the last couple months… I’d say since I moved into my new apartment living alone; whether that has anything to do with this or not. Everything always looks the same, although I never remember what the inside of the apartment really looks like.
He stuck with her during the pregnancy, doing the ‘right thing’ and marrying her for the unborn child’s sake, and to keep the peace between their families; neither of which would have tolerated the shame of a termination. Simone and her religious conviction wouldn’t have considered such a path. And frankly, wild as he was, Jake was made of strong moral fibre
"It's water vapor and something else. Particles of something. I forget. Dad said it. Go ask him."
Point to one end, which is always present.
Aesthetically it is not pleasing, but I feel more confident letting Jasper wander in and out of the house now and that has got to be better for him too.
Recommended for foodies and those who like quiet, but skilled female leads who don’t necessarily change as much as cause change in those around them; bonus for fans of Abe Hiroshi.
Guess what? The Big 6 suck at releasing ebooks. They charge too much. Their royalties are too small. Often their formatting is sub-par (I've gotten into fights with my publishers to force them to reformat ebooks of mine riddled with errors.)
$10 billion a year. I don’t think any government, non-military agency gets that much in a given year. And that’s a conservative estimate, too. I would love to see a politician brave enough to suggest that maybe, just maybe, if any illegal industry brings in more than X number of dollars in revenue, then we should at least consider legalizing it, taxing it, and imposing government safety standards. I don’t know how many illegal industries should exceed X, but there is little doubt that both illegal drugs and prostitution are two that would.
The post Should ministers have political spokespeople? was of interest to…absolutely no one, but asked whether there was a role for political spokespeople who could throw the party-political handbags at other politicians in the media without having to worry about political impartiality, leaving ministers to get on with the job of running their departments and being accountable to Parliament, and ensuring civil servants did not get embroiled in party political spats.
With beauty all around me may I walk
After our final game, M told Alden to go to school and bid him goodbye. I dropped him off at 10.30 am and rushed to the office to get some work done. I only had two hours to do my thesis before the kids get off from school. After spending only 40 minutes in the office, I got a call from school. It was the admin clerk. Apparently, Alden was being 'difficult' in class and since the substitute could not handle him, I had take him home.
My daughters favorite cookies to make are sugar cookies, the best part for her is decorating them - with lots of pink sprinkles! So here's a great recipe for Rolled Sugar Cookies:
(guilt is awesome)
We’ll let the gamblers play, and even get rich now and again. There will, however, be strict regulations and oversight to prevent the abuses so prevalent on Wall Street that damage our economy. I know what you’re thinking, but that’s how other countries with healthier economies handle things, so put a sock in it. We’ll also be throwing into jail anyone who engages in things like predatory lending. Long sentences. In nasty, rat-infested jails. Filled with mother rapers and father rapers.
Insults kill love, as love springs from kindness, honesty, purity and fairness. By insulting you stain the purity of the feeling. The feeling becoming dirty, dark and fading as quickly as it burst to life in to your heart.
You can also visit our Facebook page (Valley of the Sun Organics) for continued updates, products, news, recipes and even coupons for organic foods for a healthier lifestyle!
My dad took apart a brand new oven.
I really liked my RV000, RV52, RV55 and RV66 combo looked and I finished all the flowers and then coloured the leaves in G40, G43 and G46. I've very lightly flicked out some B0000 around the flowers and completed my card!!
Director: Gary Ross (certificate 12A, 142 minutes)
3) Failure – This is the biggest problem of all. You see, God doesn’t judge the quality of His relationship with you on the rituals and rules you practice; but if we insist on that being the standard of measurement, He will hold us to it and we will always fall short. This is what the Jews found out in the Old Testament. They were going to all the festivals. They were singing all the right songs. They were following the law. They were routinely going to temple. But the God said through the prophet Amos said, “I hate, I despise your religious feasts; I cannot stand your assemblies…But let justice roll on like a river, righteousness like a never-failing stream!” (Amos 5:21 and 24) This is what Paul meant in Romans when he said that life by the Law only leads to death.
Today the guideline is to :
How about this home office with a Régence style desk and
I don’t know where my self-publishing is going to go (if anywhere). I mean, there’s every possibility that I can practice and hone and practice and hone until I’m finally writing really well, and elucidating what I want to say, and all the rest – and the reality will be that nobody will care at all! Some of this is so subjective, and there’s no way around that. Not to mention that I’m starting out behind the curve with this whole “starting over” proposition. I mean, I’ve had lots of free downloads of my work. How does one deal with re-doing/re-vamping/re-framing work that has already been out there (and not always at “free”??) I have no idea.
This same song was a release by The Byrds too. That was before my time, but some messages are immortal. Ha! An immortal message sung by Mortal Coil.
- the smiths - meat is murder - rough trade records - 1985 (lp reissue)
However, my hair is a completely different color! It is very dark, sort of an ashy brown. From what I’ve heard it often grows back darker on those with lighter hued locks. After about a year or so the dark color starts to fade out and the original color usually returns, although sometimes that doesn’t happen. A number of women will also end up with very different hair texture after chemo…again, sometimes it eventually returns to its original state, sometimes not. Typically those formerly with straight hair will have curlier hair after, not as often the other way around. Since my hair was naturally somewhere in between, sort of wavy, who knows how this will all turn out? It’s hard to tell anything much when it’s barely an inch long.
A new addition to the graphing engine is the ability to adjust x- and y-axis bounds and tic marks independently. This provides highly customizable zoom capability.
- December 1999, attacked/stabbed repeatedly at his home outside London by intruder
Teen Clubs have sprung up in multiple sites across Botswana and other southern African countries, following Baylor’s model, and are now the largest network of support groups for HIV-positive teenagers in the world. My $100 today goes to support Ed Pettitt in his work with Thato and other HIV-positive children whose courage amazes and humbles me. I hope you’ll join me.
The delicate noise of water poured over foreheads and the muttered words, “I baptize thee…”
The countries that lay on the continent were also once steeped deeply in the traditions of Nature and Wiccan practitioners. The inquisition and proximity to the ever watchful eyes of the Church’s minions successfully severed the lines of Celtic or Wiccan lineage on the Continent. Practicing the arts and honoring life, nature and spirit, even at a speakeasy level, was simply too dangerous. Many practitioners were to lose their lives. Matriarchs and sages went underground. The teachings from parent to child were interrupted and many skills were lost forever. Open communications between families ceased. The last thing the Wiccans of Scotland wanted to experience was an English version of the Spanish Inquisition.
P/Bag X152
demonstrated in Congo in 1960 and
Scotto, Plishka, & Caballe. The halls of the
Getting there and getting home: If you do as I did and stay in the centre of town, near the station, you'll need to walk to the venue. The easiest way is to follow the street that goes across the bottom of Place de la Liberté, staying on the uphill side of it, and keep going, working your way around all the crossings and intersections: when you reach the huge Holiday Inn, you can see Cercle du Marin diagonally across the main road. Keep going past the street of shops and cross at the crossing directly in front of Cercle du Marin. There is another way, along a sort of sunken car-park-like road along the front, and it involves far fewer crossings, but I preferred this one. The sunken one is easier to find from the hotel end.
which ties everything together. I stamped and coloured the images and added crystal glaze to the flowers as Crocuses are always 'wet' looking to me as they are so low to the ground and often in the damp grass!
When Amazon removed the books and Author Central Page of writer and self-publisher, Michael N. Marcus, they jumped on a misguided bandwagon that has gathered some steam over the weekend. As Amazon has provided—as yet—no reason why they removed the author’s books, we can only assume they are protecting their corporate needs and do not want to be seen to be associated or linked in any way with the promotion of an author accused, only on the Internet, of being a convicted paedophile in the state of California.
So how do you win?
Just a few days remain before I head on a jet plane south to Peru and the Andes Mountains.
and made your way to her. To home.
To me, Balla Onivogui has reached a rare state of eternity. Through his music he will live on forever....
Crush the remaining 6 Oreos in a plastic food storage bag using a rolling pin. Sprinkle crushed Oreos on top of each brownie-battered Oreo. Bake for 12 minutes. Let cool completely before removing from tins.
I'm feeling so lucky of having the opportunity to live here for (at least) a couple of years. It's like being on holiday all the time, even after more than 1.5 years of living here....
My mother's failing health. My fear of failing to do and to be what is required of me, as her daughter, as her caretaker. The fear for her future, her safety. The fear of what this means for my future. The impending decisions of how, and where, she will live what remains of her life. And, how she will react to these decisions made on behalf of her own best interest.
You can also tap the book store icon in the title bar to open the book store and download texts directly to the tablet. In the UK, the only book store on offer is LumiRead’s own store, with a selection that can’t compete with Amazon’s virtual library.
It's what I do.
While the decision certainly was not the first victory for the Act, Wednesday’s ruling by the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit marked the first time that a related case was completely dismissed.
UK English
Perimeter us the measure of a distance around an object. For all shapes except for circles, the perimeter is just the sum of all sides. For a circle, the perimeter is 2πr, since obviously circles don’t have sides you can add.
Paul M. Fiori, 31, Yorktown Heights, N.Y.
by David Jeffries
“Did you notice that dead squirrel at the end of your driveway?” I ask. “The smell is getting pretty bad. You know, it’s your responsibility to dispose of that kind of thing if it’s in front of your house.”
"True."
4. Between 2001 and 2011, the USGS reports that there were more than 40,000 earthquakes in the U.S., almost 5,000 of which did not occur in the big three states.
I’ve been inspired by the hilarious Uncomfortable Plot Summaries for movies blogpost. Inspired enough to have read all *361* comments on it. But comments are unfortunately closed, so I didn’t get to add my own! WAH! Plus, a lot of people don’t quite get the spirit of it. It’s not about a quick summary. It’s supposed to make it more awkward/uncomfortable as well.
I never really wanted to be the princess in the castle. I wanted to be the princess that sneaks into the elite group of knights fighting for honor and her land and landing the hottest knight of them all.
STEP 2: Bring it to a boil and then reduce the heat to medium heat. Simmer until the fruit is soft, for about 8-10 minutes.
(Jim! Put your tracker back on and give John something to worry about! :-) )
Cutting through this stuff was easier than I had expected (and I was using crappy scissors).
Me: But Kai's a kid, too.
In Belgium you get such absurdities that when you go to the dentist he has not his radio on, because then he has to pay extra fees to the Copyright office, but he switches his computer on and let the music stream that way. (Using a loophole in the law.) (Plus we already do pay copyrights for listening with our subscription with the server, radio and television providers. Why to pay once more?)
Just proves my gut-feeling -- Madame La Hillary is a jerk! And her running platform is meaningless and manipulative. It's all about Madame La Hillary ..... who slept with the boss!
This Acadian hip-hop trio came out of nowhere—I mean, really, Acadian rap? Who saw that coming?—to land their album Belmundo Regal on the shortlist of the 2010 Polaris Prize alongside Broken Social Scene, the Sadies and Shad. The music was playful and intriguing, but the lyrical flow, delivered in highly regionalized Franglais,
Now is spring time and the birds that headed south to avoid the winter plus those who went to GT for Easter are coming back and everybody has a totally different perspective about how the country is doing. The one thing that makes all the comrades seem and look alike is that they all think that they are different from each other and more authoritative than the other in making judgments about the decline. The downward spiral is fuelled by mediocrity, avarice and greed. A bowjhee at that event mek a joke and say that when you Google “Guyana” and put in the keyword “sufferer” you get Prime Minister Sam Hinds trying to quell his Linden constituency.
The recent brutal murder of a 77-year-old man on his farm near Stella, who had lived on his farm, in peace, all his life, was like so many previous murders of this nature - a sadistic cowardly act that could only have been motivated by intense hatred, stirred on by the curse of the devil.
Q. We hear reports of gun shots, bomb blasts everyday that it seems like a normal thing now in Nigeria, what can be done to address this issue?
I was perusing the websites of some of the designers that I had not heard of and found Nancy Boszhardt (I assume it's prounced just like Beaux-Arts, so I immediately was in love of course). What a TALENT she is! Look at these jaw dropping-images. Pure genius.
We rode again today, but the bugs were terrible. 'Alas!' cry the owners of thin skinned thoroughbreds. He spent our entire ride in the outdoor arena shaking and kicking and biting, so we applied copious amounts of fly spray and moved to the round pen. It was hot (upper 90's) and very humid and neither of us felt like riding, but he moved willingly. We just walked, and we spent most of our time working on bending and the like. Afterwards I decided to free-lunge him in the roundpen just to make sure he got a little bit of trot work in, and he did it, but he was not happy about it. I don't understand his disdain for lunging. In my mind, lunging is easier than riding. Wouldn't you say? But every time we try and lunge, he throws a fit, doesn't want to go, and looks pissed the entire time. Perhaps he just doesn't understand the point of it? I don't know. (Though, with his luck, he probably had some unfortunate lunging accident that I have yet to find out about...)
"Danku (thank you; one of the few Dutch words I am sure of), Tante Adrie. I'll get Gem for you."
2 Tbsp freshly squeezed lemon juice
Mary and Andrea give and excellent service and pack the goodies so beautifully you don't want to open them!
I was playing with jQuery today and was able to create a simple demonstration of its draggable/droppable function. Most know this as “Drag and Drop” functionality.
PLUS... I get time to blog, so it's happy days all round really. To celebrate we went to the beach, of course, with egg sandwiches and some very tart apples. Whilst counting waves and chasing seagulls I also managed to write a list of jobs that need doing around the house and draw a little plan of the garden that's been rattling around my head for a while; all to be started next week. Today though, I'm catching up on all the blogs I've recently left unread before heading to the pub, where I'll be enjoying a strawberry and lime cider with ice and a slice!
Thanks Robert, and have lots of visitors to Malimlin, great for them, good for you.
In the name of the +Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit. Amen.
and your eyes stare,
There may be conditions, interactions or circumstances that feel good to us right now, in which case a sense or feeling of happiness naturally arises….
He would never order you to take the angels and the Prophets as Lords (arbaban); what, would He order you to disbelieve, after you have surrendered? S. 3:80 Arberry
released soon at TCM. In keeping with the color challenge, I paper-pieced
“I say we go forward then, and get something done,” answered Arik with a firm clout of his hand on the top of his axe hilt.
In the later stages of the disease, neurological symptoms may become evident such as involuntary chewing or jaw actions and convulsions. The animal may become sensitive to touch and light and may start walking around in circles. This is truly pitiful to watch. The dog seems bewildered and clumsy. The mortality rate at this stage is very high.
Hours: a few
Oxford, Autumn 1920
not to mention decorating the house, working on Christmas crafts - since we are doing an entirely hand made Christmas this year. Handmade gifts, handmade ornaments, handmade decorations... it's fun!
The thought that had been at the back of my mind- I could resist it no longer, and it unleashed its full power on me. All at once, I was wrecked with despair and terror. How am I going to survive in this foreign place for two months? It was the first time that I had been away from home for such a long time and I was absolutely on my own. What if I get kidnapped in this place? What if I got into an accident the very next day and no one would know about it? What if.. what if. All the worst possible scenarios tumbled through my mind. I had wanted to get a taste of independence when I insisted on going on this volunteer trip but now that independence was finally here, it was daunting.
I wish all of you a wonderful Sweetest Day, and a great Autumn weekend.
Hi Sarwat and welcome back to tall tales & short stories.
The rest of the world won’t be able to buy the album until March 26th – 12 months to the day after the TUC ‘March for an Alternative’ protest, when hundreds of thousands of people united on the streets of London against the government’s austerity measures and in support of a fairer society.
Why is it I wonder that this same concept is repeated so frequently in our entertainment, our myths and legends and in our conspiracy theories? What attracts us to this much repeated scenario where people who look like us, but who are out to harm us are, in truth, aliens who bear no similarity to us whatsoever physical or otherwise.
4. Shelf Awareness- I love their newsletter because it's chock full of bookish news and ads for awesome upcoming releases. Oh, and the occasional link to request free ARCs! (There I go with the free books again.)
1/2-1c broccoli florets
You know what, I am going to run a marathon no matter what it takes.
Kimbap quickly became one of my favorite comfort foods. We picked it up for potlucks, tailgates, road trip, etc.- it is the perfect snack to throw in your bag and take with you on your adventures. However, this is one of those recipes that its hard to write a recipe for… Everyone makes it differently and it is definitely one of those recipes that no one ever measures out the ingredients, you just sorta know what is needed. So think of this as your loose guide, and select your ingredients and season according to your own tastes!
In addition, we need to try and engage with the young diaspora when they visit their rural family members. Many speak good English as a result of working in cities, resorts and abroad. They have lived lives much like ours and understand our culture, yet also know village life intimately. They are surely some of the best guides we could hope to meet in our quest to understand each other on a deeper level.
The short ribs we had for the entreé were from the cattle they raise; we got 15 or 20 pounds for the dinner. It kind of completes the full circle – livestock fed at least in part with our grain – returned back braised in our beer and served with the beer that fed either that cattle or other cattle.
Have disappeared
Many Australians stick resolutely to the British tradition of Christmas cake (fruitcake) and plum pudding (I personally don't like either of them), but fresh, summery desserts, especially Pavlova, are served at Christmas as well. Pavlova is a dish which originated in Australia and New Zealand, and there is actually enormous controversy and rivalry over which country came up with it first. The dessert was named in honour of the Russian ballerina, Anna Pavlova, who toured Australia and New Zealand in the 1920s. Basically, it consists of a meringue base that has a crisp, fine outer shell, and a marshmallowy centre. The base is then topped with whipped cream and fresh fruit. I usually top a "pav" with strawberries and/or raspberries, and then sprinkle some chocolate shavings over the top.
I’m also hightailing it making up for lost workout hours for my physical conditioning class; the real issue is getting it to that prof. She wants us to go to campus between 11 AM and 2 PM this coming Monday, Tuesday, or Wednesday – problem is, it’s an hour away, and in the really, really, really bad part of town, so there’s no way in hell I’m going near that area. I think I can e-mail Wii Fit files, though, so I was going to give that a shot.
Put them back. You can do it…
We have been conditioned by the media and our families and our peers to think this way.
I have been suffering a bit from the Food Bloggers Curse. No new recipes have crossed my path or my head. It's hard to write a blog when you have nothing to blog about. (What do you mean, "What about those cookies?") I did finally hit some inspiration this week and now I can share with you the fruits (yes, I suppose there is a pun in there) of my labor.
Jettisoning* the mopey, sad-eyed routine she usually employs, Kristen Stewart gives the least annoying performance of her career as Joan Jett. Seriously, put aside her gift for mimicking Joan's tough chick mannerisms, Kristen seemed to be actually having a fun for a change. Which, if you ask me, is a welcome relief from the aforementioned moping.
Ms. Brinkley, 56 years old, has more than 500 magazine covers to her credit. She has developed lines of jewelry and eyeglasses and has become a presence at charity events and various causes in New York and the Hamptons.
respect who I am..
Although I'd previously had a few good German IPAs, such as the Braufaktum one, they were all severely overpriced, meaning that it was much cheaper to get imported ones. These were more reasonably priced though at about 20 Euro for 9 bottles. At first there's the novelty factor of drinking a citrus hopped German beer, but after a while they did seem to be a bit one dimensional.
Sorry again for my delay about posting, I have no excuses.
This was hard to choose, but this guy is raw. Got alot of talent, and plenty of room to grow. He is a project and I think can be prosperous at the next level. I see this man going in the 3rd round. Look for the Browns to be eyeing this man.
Looking back its clear its more than literally throwing out one thing every day. In truth due to life getting in the way that wasn't always possible, although I found myself then tending to throw out 10 items in one go which either made up or put me in credit.
I was selling to national retail chains who were purchasing cleaning products in full truckloads, with orders being shipped into national warehouses. Delivery to individual stores was accomplished through a distribution system owned by the stores. My accounts were companies such as Safeway Supermarkets, and Eddie Bauer department stores, located in the northwestern part of the US. If the account did not purchase in full truckloads, then I was not allowed to even call on them.
"What I personally love about my job, is the freedom I have. I get to dress however I want, do my make-up however I want, and style my hair however I want. I get to dance all night and I talk to people who I would have never met on a regular basis. I get to make up new drinks and have my customers taste them (most love my lil concoctions). I work at night only a few nights a week and that is enough for me to pay all my bills and then some. I get to be invited to some pretty kick ass events... I could go on and on about all the perks. But what I really motivates me IS seeing people smile. I know, I know, It sounds soooo cheesy, but I know my role in your day. You come to the club for a release of everyday life. You want to escape from your constant reality and get lost in a moment. And as a bartender, all I can hope is that I want to be a positive experience for you. That's why I dance and sing all night. That is why you will always see me smiling or laughing. That's why I start up conversations with strangers at my bar. That is why I always want say Hi to everyone that I recognize. That is why I do some cornball, goofy thing when I know your watching me... To make you smile. I like to think this is my small contribution to the world right now :)"
other Cantabridgians.
In books I find the dead as if they were alive; in books I foresee things to come; in books warlike affairs are set forth; from books come forth the laws of peace. All things are corrupted and decay in time; Saturn ceases not to devour the children that he generates; all the glory of the world would be buried in oblivion, unless God had provided mortals with the remedy of books.
Cashew nut paste: 1 cup
Finally The Mephisto Kiss cover is here!!! Last year I helped Trinity Faegan reveal the cover for her first novel The Mephisto Covenant and all I can say is gorgeous! This year I invited a few of my friends to help promote the amazing cover for Trinity's second novel The Mephisto Kiss! Again Egmont did a great job because I think the cover is stunning. I have a feeling this cover will really stand out in person.
Collector's POV: The prints in this show are priced as follows. The 26x18 prints are $3000 each and the 41x27 prints are $6000 each. Wiley's work has not yet entered the secondary markets, so gallery retail is likely the only option for interested collectors at this point.
‘And on the left?’
So anyway, I love the whole candy, roses, and love idea. One thing though. Your supposed to show people you love that you love them every day. So why did they make a holiday about it? It should be V-Day everyday!
What’s most interesting about it, though, is that while the number seems pretty impressive, thanks to Steve Jobs, and his little buddy Mark Zuckerberg, it just doesn’t knock you over.
" Each year Atos Healthcare process over 1.2 million referrals for medical advice completing over 800,000 face-to-face medical assessments within our nationwide network of over 140 medical examination centres.'
Who are active in deeds of charity;
"And if I need medical attention, I will wait until we are in England and I will consult a proper physician." She punctuated this by grabbing Miss Farnham by the arm in a grip that made Alexander wince for the young woman's sake, and pulled her charge behind her, still talking.
It is Saturday and was sitting in chair, laptop on lap, surfing away.
Country singer Riley Jensen would never have returned to her small Missouri hometown if her publicist hadn’t come up with the scheme to tape a Christmas special there. So she never would have known that the man who broke her heart at eighteen—causing her to flee to Nashville—was now a widower with a seven-year-old daughter. Riley has ten years of angst-filled hit songs and Grammy awards to prove she doesn’t need Ethan Kent. But suddenly, she can’t help thinking of all she gave up by running away…
I also got my first leech bite .It wasn’t till an hour or so later when I’d got back home from a trek to a dam through a freaky jungle path that I noticed the red blob on my foot .
“I will stay here as long as you need me” he replied, and kissed the top of my forehead. My skin tingled with the sensation of his wet lips on my skin.
This November, I’ll be writing. Oh yes, I’ll be writing, but I’ll be writing at my own pace. I’ll be writing daily, but maybe not 1667 words a day. I’ll be living this writer’s life and feeding off all that novel-writing energy in the air, but I’ll also be living November.
Kelly pricked her ears.
And I love it.
Ultimately it’s about timely communication and raising issues as they happen to address them. Otherwise, how can the photographer or the client understand how events can impact on the shoot time and affect the original estimate?
Cue a terrible allergy attack, and I took two more Benadryl. Eventually I fell asleep, and when I woke the next morning, I felt incredibly hung over from the allergy medication. I felt like death was on my doorstep. I felt awful. And sad. But I wasn’t sure why.
Donald - told another sob story about death. So much death in one night, t’s starting to get nausiating. This is monday night, prime time, mirrorball trophy, sequins and open chest vests, Dancing with the stars. geez! Anyways, Donald had a solid effort, you can tell he is another one that needs the time to really master the steps and his performance will get better as he moves forward. However, with such a strong cast and a night of great dancing, he might not be given that chance.
Homosexuality.
Sir:-
But you hurriedly take glances at the clock
On a side note, this recipe is sure to please everyone. My 3 year old is sitting right now eating it with a spoon. :)
Does this mean our situation is hopeless? No, our situation is hopeless only so long as self-defined patriots think that restoring the Constitution, as written, is a viable path. As I have said many times, there is nothing broken with the Constitution that needs restoring; it is working fine and dandy, just as it was designed to do, which is to protect the elites from the rabble, foreign and domestic, who might otherwise take exception to unremitting theft and corruption under the color of twisted law.
Now all that is missing are some white linen curtains, the rest of the knobs for the tallboy (which I had to order...) and a rug for her floor. I am thinking of crocheting an oval rag rug in the same shades of blue and pink that I have used in her room. Oh..and the farmhouse bench....it seems they are not that high on the 'wants' list of a 14 year old girl....go figure!!;) So I will have to find another spot for one:(
Three. Goddamn. Months.
 Enhanced feelings of self-worth and self-importance that go along with their successful “reconquista” of large parts of America – their being the conquerors; vanquishing their perceived White oppressors.
Although an interior designer may create the layout of a space, they may not build the space without having their designs stamped for approval by an architect, which is why many interior designers also complete school to become architects as well. An interior designer may wish to specialize in a particular type of interior design in order to develop technical knowledge specific to that area. Types of interior design include residential design, commercial design, hospitality design, healthcare design, universal design, exhibition design, spatial branding, etc. The interior designer is responsible for the interior design, decoration, and functionality of a client’s space, whether the space is commercial, industrial, or residential.
**Pigeon can also be done while lying down on your back. Bend your knees, then place the right ankle on the top of the left knee. Interlace your fingers around the left leg, then hug both legs towards your chest. You should feel a similar stretch in the outer right thigh.
CCTV footage of the incident shows Yildirim leading the girl to a disabled toilet in the shopping centre where they stayed for nine minutes while Yildirim penetrated her.
Assalaamu alaikum wa rahmatullah,
After all, if it’s your confidence, its your journey –
With a wink and a turn, she walked away. It was a good day for her to not wear her cloak. Her suit clung to her and her walk did everything for a woman that it should.
No real travel this springtime besides offshore to GET THAT OIL. Looking forward to a Caribbean cruise in June which will actually leave from Baltimore. Which means I will certainly hit Beck and Brickskeller before and maybe after the cruise. Holla.
There are no penalties for abusing animals on fur farms in China, which is the world’s largest fur exporter, supplying more than half of the finished fur garments imported for sale in the United States. Foxes, minks, rabbits, dogs, cats, and other animals pace and shiver in outdoor wire cages, with no shelter from driving rain, freezing nights, or the scorching sun.
Moreover, once a petitioner has challenged the validity of a patent through a PGR, that party may not challenge validity in a court proceeding based on any ground it raised during the PGR. Additionally, a party who has challenged the validity of a patent in court may not file a PGR petition on any grounds they raised, or could have raised, in the district court. Because the district court action allows the challenger the full panoply of discovery (unlike the restricted discovery appropriate to the more limited PGR proceeding), the Committee believes that it is only reasonable to apply estoppel to claims the challenger was, or should have been, in a position to raise, whether or not it did so.
Wednesday- your sassy sites
With top-ranked funds, you are in the right place.
Fernandez, 58, was easily elected to a second four-year term in October, vowing to deepen her unorthodox policies despite complaints from business leaders who say her heavy-handed management of the economy is stifling investment.
4) How do your family and friends feel about your tattoo(s)? Have you run into any adversity or negativity because of them?
When the morning group broke off into three focus groups, the teacher group began by sharing stories. Not ten minutes into the guided discussion, one of the teachers from the south, an ELA teacher, leaned over and mouthed, “We need to talk!”
Recently, a growing number of articles have appeared about the role of manufacturing in the USA. The correlation of this increased interest with a challenging economy, and thus political environment, is not surprising. The 1980s has presented us with an earlier example. As a matter of fact, the Future Professors of Manufacturing Program at Stanford University was an outcome of this interest to revive manufacturing in the US. (I was one of the five PhD students of its inaugural class.) So my first point: nil novi sub sole.
Sunday 31 October
loving enough to help man beyond the realm of medical science. This has been
Progression is getting more and more rapid everyday. It seems almost every time you buy something, it’s obsolete by the time you open the box. Computers. Video game systems. Your fuckin’ PANTS!
Here’s one of my favorite songs that always inspires me to do the right thing when it’s so ever tempting to do the contrary.
Sure, it hasn’t always been easy for either of us, or for your sisters. You were a difficult child, to say the least, but that wasn’t your fault. When you hit your late teens, everything changed, though. You ‘grew up’ and became the most wonderful person I’ve ever had the pleasure of knowing. You never judge people by the way they look, speak or write - only ever by what’s in their heart and you always look for the good in a person, even when they’ve wronged you. You’re quick to forgive and quick to say sorry yourself. News of people being hurt upsets you and news of people being happy makes you smile. You’re never jealous, and you’re always willing to share. We really wouldn’t want you to be anybody other than the wonderful man that you are.
But, when it is through
This week I finally broke a barrier. It's a barrier I have been fighting with for at least 6 weeks now. I wanted my tens column number to drop. I was holding steady at the one or two( in the ones column)...depending on my week. Well when school started I was walking my son to school. Then he got moved to AM kindergarten. I decided I would walk him home. Then we hit triple digits heat by noon and there was no way I was walking in that. Then our air conditioner broke. I seriously must have sweated away what I lost, because yesterday I busted through that barrier! My tens column number finally went down! I am also comfortably fitting into the next size down. So what am I doing?
When I'm ellipticalling, I am sweating my face off and I have been going for time equivalent, not distance.
There are guns on the streets, there are depraved individuals who wield them and until we decide that these problems are important enough to address as a society, until we stop thinking that the building of stadiums and vacant overpriced condos can prevent these occurrences, they will happen. We are a society, a community, and the problems that are left untreated will reach us no matter how hard society tries to push those problems away.
Sunday, 6 August: Komarom and the “A” towns: Gyor, a city we had actually heard of and were looking forward to visiting because of its basilica, was only 20 kilometers away so we were there very early. So early on a Sunday morning that nothing was open so still no breakfast. An elderly lady approached us as we were standing off our bikes and immediately directed us to MacDonalds, assuming that is what we were looking for. She told us that other than the Basilica, MacDonalds was the only thing in Gyor worth visiting. MacDonalds is not a place we ordinarily visit very often but we were hungry and really wanted some coffee so we took her advice. We had coffee, juice and three (each) cherry turnovers. I still remember them because they were very hot and I burned my mouth on the sugary, syrupy filling.
I used my Silhouette and a circle punch to cut out a few different sized circles. My biggest circle is 3 inches in diameter and it was the perfect size to cover the entire clothespin. I layered two papers to add a little interest and attached them to each other with a glue dot roller.
The whole episode lasted a good 20 minutes, but it could have gone on much longer if we didn't have the foresight to set up our devices on iCloud. Can you imagine? We could have called Grandma and Grandpa to see if they may have taken the phone. Then they start searching and backtracking through the night. Hubby could have gone out to check every crevice of his car. It goes on and on. But thanks to this techy fab app, all it took was twenty minutes. It would have been even faster if we had remembered to look there first, and if I had already had the app on my phone. Lesson learned and app downloaded and ready to go.
earn’d wages,
On Wednesdays I gave cooking lessons and invited her to the lesson the next day.
Read to the daughter at bedtime, she has started to ask me to change the screen saver message on the main computer, just so she can see a different message every night, doesn’t she realise I have enough to do? “Postaday” on Word Press, photo a day on Flickr? Ok so maybe I don’t have enough to do, not according to the 6 year old daughter anyway (yes, yes she is nearly 7years old),
The University of Houston Libraries, the HERE Project at Rice University, African American Studies at the University of Houston, and the Cynthia Woods Mitchell Center for the Arts at the University of Houston present a conference exploring the unique music and culture of Houston hip hop. Awready! spotlights the late DJ Screw, originator of the “chopped and screwed” genre. The full schedule and event details may be found at http://lws.lib.uh.edu/hiphop/.
Humanly speaking, things were getting rough out there on the Mediterranean Sea. But Paul’s faith was neither in the seamanship of the sailors nor in the sailing expertise of the captain. His faith was in God. From Psalm 118:8, “It is better to trust in the Lord than to put confidence in man.”
Anyway, here is the one I picked, probably because I'm a sucker for square cards. ;)
Thanks for not running me over while I was out running with my baby in the jogging stroller. I know you tried super hard and came REALLY close to hitting us. If I could do it over I would go back and give you a piece of my mind! When did you decide that looking in front of your car before hitting the gas was optional? You should lose your drivers license!
Anyway watching this has made me go back and think about all those creepy guys that you get at the bar. We all know the people, they come at you with stupid pick up lines, breathing their nasty alcohol breath, and trying to take you home. Generally they just creep you out. When I worked at my bar in college we had a dance floor in the middle of the upstairs and I would witness poor young girls getting creeped on by older males (when I say older I mean 22 because that was old to an 18 year old back then) and running away.
So, since I have a hard time purposely being funny, I thought I would relay to you something that made me laugh.
ECM Libra surfacing as a substantial shareholder possibly explains the heightened trading volume in E&O shares from mid-April, which in turn, nudged E&O’s stock to its 52-week high of RM1.54 on May 3. Since mid-April, E&O’s stock has gained more than 20%. It closed down one sen to RM1.44 yesterday.
Brent: Interestingly, the very first inspiration for the book, even before I knew the story, was a true story I'd heard as I child: how my hometown of Tacoma, Washington, rounded up all its Chinese residents back in the 19th century, burned down Chinatown, and forced all the residents out of town and on a train down to Oregon. It was an historical event that ended up being called the "Tacoma Method" for a city's dealing with its immigrant population, and even today, over a hundred years later, Tacoma has a very small Chinese American population (not surprisingly).
5. PERSONALIZATION: the false belief that one has directly caused some undesirable consequence.
10 x 400 (actually quarter mile) at the track. At first I thought these were going to suck because I was just not getting under two minutes. The first four were over 8-minute pace. But then for no apparent reason it turned around and all the rest were two minutes or under, at a sub-8 pace! The last one was about a 7:30 pace. I was very pleased. I also did about 2.5 miles warm-up, 90 seconds recovery jog between laps, and a cool down which brought the total mileage for the run to 7.5 miles.
Such natural grace; something pure of will.
style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;left&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;a &amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;href&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;"
Cove: You will find a small but lovely cove at about the .88-mile mark. Look for a short trail to your left for an unobstructed vantage point. On the other side of the cove, you will encounter a bluff that gives a good aerial view.
It looked different.
and the rainclouds gathered above us, my expectations on the recording were quite modest. But I must say that it sounds really
Having the blues is different from singing the blues. That's getting rid of the blues. These are blues I will never get rid of, but I will sing them the best way I know.
There’s also sharks. I’m not afraid of sharks, but the list of differences between pools and oceans would be incomplete without them.
I really enjoyed the Humane Society of Utah volunteer training I completed today! I have, as mentioned in my last post, chosen to work with dogs. Today I learned the basics of HSU dog handling procedures, and got the opportunity to walk a few dogs, too.
I pack a lunchbox full of drinks for the girls (I should include drinks for us but for some reason I forget to plan ahead for that part). I also pack a bag of snacks. I joke that it becomes an all you can eat cruise line buffet for them. They really don't mind the drive and pretty much never complain about it. I think at least some of that is due to the fact that they pig out on Fig Newtons, Teddy Grahams, Nilla Wafers, and any other snacks I include all in the same day with little restriction. That never happens on a normal day so it's just fun. Before Kaitlyn could manage a ziploc on her own, I used those handy little snack trap cups (Munchkin sells a version now too) that way if she dropped it, it didn't spill all over the place. I even put veggies in there once when Addison was a baby, hehe. While the snacking is virtually unlimited, the drinks are rationed quite conservatively until we are approaching a planned stop. One handy little gadget we have discovered is the Sprout Spout.
hassle
This supernatural journey I had been on for 10 or so years had finally slowed down. I didn’t stop believing in God, I still believed the same things, but somehow I knew something was missing. Keep in mind I had been a part of booming churches and I saw God move in ways I couldn’t explain. I saw good happening to people inside these doors, but outside I saw a hand written sign that was reminiscent of the “NO GIRLS ALLOWED” signs we used to have at the club house. Except these signs read, “No gays allowed, No questing allowed, or marginalized, no homeless, no outcast, no misfits…
yes (+7)
What we did do however, was take a guided tour at one stage, and I was so proud of the way Liam stood so attentive, asking many questions.
while I, courting ingenuous young lovers,
It’s true; I am sick to death of YA fiction I’ve been reading. I’m sick and tired of the angst. I don’t want dark, traumatic and sombre stuff. I loathe and detest the dystopia. The world is a shitty enough place as it is, there’s enough angst and trauma out there. I don’t want to drag it into my leisure time. I want to read stories that are hopeful, happy, and maybe, God forbid, even just a little bit funny.
Now how’s that for stepping out of your comfort zone. He is traveling thousands of miles to a very unfamiliar place to do a very brave thing. He taught me a lot that day. Thank you Clay! And a special thank you to his mama Mary for believing in me. Such an incredible family and I am blessed to know them.
All designed and illustrated by us and printed and made inAustralia.
It's my turn now. I grit my teeth. It is again the virgin who strikes first. The pain is excruciating, and I too try not to emit any groan. Turning around to look at the young woman I am stunned since I seem to recognize those green eyes flashes. What hell of a witchcraft is that?
The Mustang? Seriously!? Nope, just some old guy.
Like many folks, I feel this inherent need to help people. It was there long before my time in law enforcement and it is still there long after, but I'm not afforded the protection, both in terms of criminal and civil liability, that I had as a police officer. Now before everyone start beatin' up on cops... that's just the way it is... and I whole-heartedly support it for good, honest folks serving in law enforcement. I don't support it for those few that tarnish the badges of the good ones.
A virus linked to prostate cancer also appears to play a role in chronic fatigue syndrome, according to US research.
So, this blog contains a goodbye... Goodbye Tommy, our much loved silly cat!! I miss having you sleep in front of the computer screen so I can't read what I type. I miss listening for your Siamese yowl when you have determined there is something you need ( like being let out of a closed room). I know we will miss having our tree tipped several times next Christmas time. Tommy, we will miss you playing in the bathtub in the middle of the night. We miss watching your antics as you play with Taz or stage a mock attack on Bailey the doxie. Taz misses you and looks for you daily and nightly. I miss you sleeping by my head at night, I wake up and reach for your silky fur listening for you thundering purr and then realize, you aren't there... Grief is so hard, it hurts so much... if I had it to do over, I would have kept you safely inside, and never allowed you to experience the delight of the outdoors. I know you are in a much better place now, but that doesn't make the hurt of missing you any less. Someday, we will see you again, pretty Tommy but until then know that we will always love you in our hearts and will miss you always.
mistakes, when we all know they think their only mistake was getting
So, considering I’m just one person, one review, and Henderson has several bestsellers while I have none, she must be doing something right :)
-yours truly summarizing the general way of things at the time
I want these moments to last, a sincere plea.
“Oh, ‘miss thing’ wouldn’t stop at a gas station rest stop” Marcus said while rolling his eyes. “She’s like all afraid some lesbian might be hiding in one of the stalls.”
Toads were rare but I’ve run across a few in my time. I remember driving home and noticing one in the middle of the road and this fellow must have been six inches wide – a wonderful specimen. I stopped the car and carried him over to the riverbank. There was one in our back garden a few years back which I dashed upstairs with to show Carrie. She says she’s rarely seen me as delighted over anything. And it’s true, I was. It was like being a wee boy again and we all know the wee boys we once were never die; they get swallowed whole by the adults we are forced to become but they never disappear completely.
And failing that, I guess I’ll just have to settle for tugging myself off. Which, as a point of interest is what I’m going to do as soon as I’ve finished writing this blog entry.
Hello! Here's an easy mid-week recipe that takes 5 minutes to put together, then it's off to the dehydrator for an overnight stay. You'll wake up tomorrow with crispy, flavorful, fall-inspired crackers.
Investment in foreign land by large companies, or land-grabs as they have become known, have drastically increased in popularity since the beginning of the millennium. The majority of these investments have taken place in Sub-Saharan Africa where vast amounts of land, up to 90 percent in fact, is owned by the state rather than the individuals that live, work and die on it. This makes it easy for governments to sell this land to foreign companies looking to start up business, most of which is agricultural, in the area.
Vinegar and newspapers
I got so bad during this last football season that I alienated every one I worked for, with, and those who worked under me. And, in the process, I forgot those who were most important, my girls and Jen.
And maybe a link or two to past blog entries from the same date.
2. Add the potatoes, grated carrot, onions, garlic, and herbs. Add another 2-3 cups water and bring to a boil once again. Boil 10-15 minutes or until potatoes are soft. Soup can be served at this stage but I recommend letting it simmer another 30 minutes or so on a low flame. Once the soup cools it thickens and has the greatest texture. Add water and stir as necessary to avoid burning.
Here's our simple lunch today...potato macaroni salad with chicken breast, carrots, Japanese cucumbers, and hard boiled eggs. I used two separate pots to cook the ingredients so as to speed things up...the sequence of cooking the ingredients are important when you want to save time. The first two ingredients to be cooked were the hard boiled eggs and the macaroni as there is no preparation required...while they were boiling away, I diced the carrots, potatoes and the cucumbers. Then I boiled the potatoes, blanched the carrots and cucumbers, and cooked the chicken breast. While these were cooking, I removed the shells of the eggs and cut them into chunks. Everything was drained and placed in a big mixing bowl...I added some salt, freshly cracked black pepper, dried parsley and some mayo, just enough to coat the ingredients. I even managed to clean and tidy up the kitchen counter before my son stepped into the house.
the authorities doing that?
I will continue to wear my band with pride not only for Andrew but for everyone who suffers from this illness. Please help by spreading the word-you can share this post on to your facebook page by pressing the letter "F" at the bottom of this post.
Stop and think about that for a moment.
-Long Shot: Only if someone much more expected is left off will those from this category make it in.
it can only hold so much sadness
Tears cannot fall and all that I can do is laugh. I ran faster and my dog shoots ahead of me.
One trick is to just fold one edge up until it meets the top edge, then crease it, and then cut along the outside or unfolded edge. Now open it up, and you’re going to use the crease that was formed when you folded the parchment as a guideline to cut your triangle out.
Whatever one’s views on RBB, this is dismal stuff. In a way it’s stunning that the Minister – given her position and interest in these matters – has not heard (or presents it as if she had not heard) the term ‘welfare queen’, but worse again is the quite deliberate misunderstanding and misrepresentation of RBB’s words.
"Mr and Mrs Hanger-Ending...and their son Cliff"
The cow had been only three weeks away from her due date, so we quickly attempted a c-section. We didn't have any equipment except for a utility knife, but that would prove to be good enough. My dad made the incisions, our two farmhands and I pulled, and in a matter of minutes we were loading a living, breathing calf into the back of the pickup truck. We got it back to the dairy, cleaned it up, laid it in a bed of hay, and fed it a half-gallon of colostrum milk. By the time we finished working today, it was doing as well as we would expect any newborn calf to be doing.
Numb.
I recalled narco-politics when I attended the Cebu Bloggers Meet-Up organized by Janette Toral and Max Limpag, and hosted by Sun Star. Janette Toral presented insights on how bloggers can actively participate in the 2010 presidential elections. She stressed the crucial role of bloggers to promote transparency in Philippine elections. Electoral transparency is a prevailing issue which affects the political stability of our nation.
This book isn't on the epic scale of some of Laxness' other works, but I found it to be an enjoyable read- and much better the second time after I had gotten a little more background on its setting and themes. It has a much faster pace than most of his others, the whole novel unfolds in less than a year. Laxness again shows sensitivity and insight in handling a female character, and while Ugla is hardly the heroic figure portrayed in Salka Valka, her character has real depth. I've found myself quoting this book on more than one occasion. It might be a bit bewildering at times for the beginning Laxness reader, but it is a solid effort by a truly great novelist.
Our friends were already seated in the bar when we arrived with complementary nuts and olives in front of them, after a toss up between cocktails or G&T’s we decided on the later. Tanqueray Ten and Fevertree tonic for most and a Hendricks and tonic for me, served with cucumber of course.
a daughter against her mother,
1 decomposed
So for this weeks "Make it Monday" at Sew Sweet, I thought it would be lovely to contribute a tutorial to make a small last minute gift for your special Mum, Grandma and other loved ones.
The first round of PICs held earlier this year identified the opportunities and constraints to walking and mobility in the City. PIC #2 will present the alternative solutions based on public and agency input gathered from PIC #1.
You wont see any blogging this weekend from me. I have decided not to bring the computer with me, and just take this time for family and hopefully getting some relaxation in while I am at the hospital. So I will post some pics and do more blogging next week! If I have any giveaways that say they have ended, but I havent actually posted the winners yet, feel free to still enter. I will extend their closing dates to when I get back next week to pick a winner.
I started this book almost a year ago. Then in October I had my laptop stolen. It wasn't backed up (it is now) and I lost every last bit of work I'd done on the book. I started making my notes again from scratch on 7th October. I sent the book off on 1st March. I hope I never have to work to that kind of timetable again, but I think I got away with it.
I’ve got a photo in my town’s newspaper that is supposed to hit the stands today. It’s of my daughter and some mates in dance class. I only wish her face was better hidden. Then I could share it, here.
Just like your clothing wardrobe, there are many essential elements to dressing up your event with high-style stationery and invitations.
It seems that the weather is getting particularly hot nowadays. Or maybe it’s just me? I dunno, but I definitely know that I have not been covering myself with a blanket when I sleep for the past few days.
Denise Neal, one of the page's organizers, said the idea originated in a conversation between herself, her sister and their aunt. They wanted to collectively express their grief and show their support to Neal's parents, and chose leaving a porch light on after deciding that having candles lit all day was too dangerous.
They mostly talk to each other and go to seminars and tell each other how smart they are and how important their jobs are and how the peasants need parks and how parks will bring jobs and sustainability and whatever current buzzwords they have just learned in whatever wonderful self congratulating seminars they have just attended.
Update: I am currently working on drafting a report on the same - compiling a list of issues that require clarification in the proposed Intermediary Guidelines and factors to be considered in developing the intermediary liability law in India. I would love to hear from our readers on suggestions/additions. Please do write to me at mohanty.amlan@gmail.com if you have any suggestions!
When turning, people would just put one hand casually down on that side, or point to the ground to the left or right of them.
After a long day at whatever respective job you perform, you sit down in front of the computer and turn the monitor on
Lamb Shank, 1 pc
Me: 'The charger's in there too.'
But I wasn’t going to let that get in the way! I cleaned everyone and everything up … Patella helped, she licked herself and the floor and licked up all the bits she could reach and find on the walls and cabinet doors, Mei kicked her feet in delight and continued playing with her toys, watching Patella dart around the kitchen, snout to the floor, hunting for more bits to lick up and I put an extra teaspoon of brown sugar, white sugar and a tablespoon (since that’s what I guesstimated that I lost…) of butter back into the bowl. Thankfully, all this excitement meant that the whisk actually beat the butter up enough that I could run the whisk and everything would stay in the bowl this time and cream up nicely! Scraping down the sides of the bowl periodically, I beat the butter and sugars until they were nice, light, creamy and frothy and continued on with the recipe.
But the research is there:
- Play and art can open up the creative cognitive processes: broad scanning ability, fluidity of thinking, flexibility, insight, synthesizing abilities, and divergent thinking
Ms Campbell said Mrs Woollard had never contacted her to see how she was.
Nier most certainly is a creative work, a labour of love, and it should be applauded for that.
My people – the Palestinians – are the longstanding victims of Israeli racism. Victims of racism, anywhere, should never condone or support the maltreatment of another people, as Israel does.
FEEDING POPULIST ANGER
Tx #2
Oh boy am I behind…
The Breville Toaster Oven, also known as the Breville Smart Oven, consistently receives great ratings and glowing reviews. It is somewhat surprising, given the fact that this oven costs about 0 for the regular sized version and about 0 for the compact oven. Why are so many people impressed with this oven when they could have spent for a toaster oven at the local discount big box store? Is there really that big of a difference between the Breville Smart Oven and typical inexpensive models?
Bobo: That's 1000% right Lilly.
Here are a few of my favorites from the numerous trickster tales in world literature anthologies, along with some story collections.
and yet he said i could
Some of the most valuable real estate out there is nothing you could build a house or a hotel on. It is the government-regulated electromagnetic spectrum, the frequencies over which we broadcast radio, television and, increasingly, data for smart phones, tablets and other wireless gizmos.
With legal repercussion out of the equation, the “battle” remains between poster, snarker and harasser. But the “battle” could end with a blackened screen.Walk away.
This post is long overdue. Long, long overdue. Every now and then it occurs to me that I should really knuckle down and get it finished. But something else always seems to get in the way. Just lately it's been yet more building work in the house. We've had a couple of walls knocked out in the kitchen, the ceiling re-plastered, and the bricked-up fireplace in the dining room opened up. Oh, and we've had new windows and doors put in and a shiny new fire escape installed. That's about it really. And in amongst all this I've managed to find myself a part time job, five mornings a week. Quite a lot to be going on with. And I'm still morris dancing.
KATE BUSH – SENSUAL WORLD 2011
Five years later, I am finding this lesson is even bigger than Down syndrome. This lesson applies to everyone in my life. It applies to me and my love for both my daughters. It applies to my love for my husband. It applies to how I want my family, both immediate and extended to love me. Those eight words sound so simple to do but are really so complex in practice.
The girls and I flew down to AR last week, Kyle came a few days later. The trip down was mostly uneventful - Abby and E did great on the flights - especially considering that one of them was over 4 hours long (whew) I was glad to have Brittany's help for sure.
a week at 5am on a cardio machine browsing through current card
1 begetting
My log is a crappy composition book I bought for $0.59 when school supplies were on sale. Keeping a paper log does three things for me:
I really enjoyed reading The Seasons on Henry's Farm; A Year of Food and Life on a Sustainable Farm by Terra Brockman. Henry is Terra's youngest brother who has taken over the job of running the family farm. Terra moved away from the homestead to go to college and spent a good fifteen years living in cities and having a career before finally returning home to help her brother on the farm. Because of the type of land, rolling hills rather than plains, the farm did not succumb to the move in the 1960's and 70's to become a single crop farm growing just corn or soybeans. The land didn't lend itself to that type of farming, so though it did go through hard times then, because Terra's parents never really got on board with the 'modern' way to farm, it was very easy to restablish the farm as a sustainable, organic one. In fact, much of their sustainable, organic practices are simply doing things the way their great grandparents did, on the farm.
Each clock can take 400 to 500 hours of work.
A little-noticed smoldering plane wreckage with traces of cocaine in a remote area of the West African state of Mali in which an Al Qaeda affiliate and nomadic rebels are active has focused attention on the emergence of the region as a major hub for the trafficking of drugs to Europe.
Kelly the Kitchen Kop is giving away 2 great health and nutrition books. One lucky winner will receive Eat Fat, Lose Fat and A Life Unburdened. The book Eat Fat, Lose Fat is the reason I frequently use coconut oil in my cooking now!
Honestly one of these years I'll figure out the peaks and troughs of my writing moods and I'll work out a timetable that fits in with the peaks. I find that I'm dreaming a lot. Sometimes it's about my WIPs, sometimes it's about my future and sometimes it's just a little idea that I'm spinning around in my imagination. Did you ever 'take a line for a walk' in art class when you were a kid? Just take a black crayon on a blank sheet and twirl it around any which way to see what shows up. Then afterwards you colour in all the shapes it made to see if you can see a pattern? Well I'm doing that with little ideas, just to see what comes up. Right now it's a lot of scribbles but who knows perhaps there's a Picasso just around the corner.
A couple of days later, after the morning train had gone, Shankar was about to step on another snake. Perhaps it was the same cobra. Perhaps it was another.
to deepen its comparative
carry on?
02 Rise and Shine
The Man Who Makes The Future – Interview with Marc Andreesen, who at 22 invented early graphical web browser, Mosaic/Netscape, and staged the first dotcom IPO in 1995. Now he’s a big-time venture capitalist. His firm just made $800m on Instagram.
2. Flip the image over and color with Copic Markers on the back of the acetate. Your coloring will not be perfect...but it will look fine once the image has been glittered.
There are many things one has to give up in order to go on a trip around the world. There’s leaving family and friends, a solid career, and even all of those daily “extras” like *Starbucks, eating out, and unnecessary car trips in order to save for said trip.
I finished reading Compulsion and thought about how I would break down its essence.
When the alarm rang this morning, Roger still in the air returning from South Africa, I couldn't quite face getting out of bed, lifting Robert from his own bed, peeling off his possibly urine-soaked p.j.s, changing his diaper, venting his stomach while he was lying on his back, putting a drop in his eye to treat his conjunctivitis, and dressing him--then putting him in his wheelchair, connecting all 5 points of his positioning belts, loading him in the elevator and bringing him downstairs to where all the work actually starts: getting 10 ounces of formula in him through his g-tube before the bus arrives, mixing a cocktail of powdered medications with a bit of applesauce and water so they might be drawn into a syringe, administering another liquid medication, finishing this with 4 ounces of water, putting on his shoes and socks, threading one arm into his jacket, wrapping it behind his back, threading the other arm through. Then loading his pre-packed backpack with the "lunch" of bolus and tubing and syringes I'd packed the night before onto the back of his wheelchair.
“Darkness bears no relation to evil, it is merely a means of making you see reality without the interference of light”.
“That’s easy, I’ve done harder ones than that!” chirped the little one confidently.
or you could suddenly forget
I keep thinking back to the comment François Truffaut made in 1977 about being "too young" when he made Jules and Jim. If he'd made it at any other age, it wouldn't be the same movie and probably wouldn't hold the same appeal for so many. Granted, critics of an older age appreciated and praised the film at its release, but for Jules and Jim to grab you, really grab you, and maintain that grip over the years, I think you need to be young when you see it the first time, and that's why Truffaut, not yet 30 but captivated by the novel since 25, had to be young as well. I found this clip on YouTube and knew I had to include it. It's the great actor John Hurt extolling the virtues of Jules and Jim and what an impression it made on him. He was 22 when it opened.
it was the perfect embellishment for the sentiment.
The last two I can’t find links to but there is plenty to listen to just from the links above. It is going to be a great mix of the explosive, the gentle, the lulling and the very loud.
– The Travel Sequence, studio recording 1972 (previously unreleased)
Throw in my lack of money, glasses, joy of goth fashion, my high iq, and an awkward personality I might as well been born with a bullseye on my forehead. It started off simple. Guys in kindergarten whispering about me, yeah that early. Then it painfully increased.
Women like Louisa May Alcott and many others have sought to establish their own authoritative identities among the myriad of women, who through the centuries have struggled for their independence in a man’s world, having had to fight their way into publication and credence in the world of male authors. The voices of womankind have been crying out for the freedom of the written word in the quest for personal identity in a culture that expects women to suppress their own thoughts, feelings, and desires while submitting to male domination. In a recent movie version of Little Women this resonates in a scene where Jo tried to submit her stories to a publisher who told her his magazine didn’t publish fairy stories, but that she could go to one of the ladies magazine publishers. Much of women’s writings reflect this kind of rejection in their search for independent identities, along with their efforts to find a place in that culture for women who think for themselves, even when tied to the apron strings of marriage and motherhood.
On the positive Brooke would cook during her husband's absence during WW11. Her dishes were named after leaders of the time. She conceived up delightful recipes titled MacArthuroni and Cheese, Eisenhower's Eggs Benedict and Churchill's Cherry and Cream Pie. No there is no recipes for Hitler's Ham or Stalin's Stale Borscht. I thought the recipe idea was rather quaint.
The first thing to do when testing paper is to draw a circle with your multiliner (if you don't own a multiliner, then stamp an image in ink you know is safe such as Memento). Also ensure that you have clean scratch paper under your work - it is perfectly normal for colours to bleed through the back!
baking paper; saucepan; wooden spoon; 2 mixing bowls;
The Panning and Linear accessories provide ultimate flexibility for a range of movement and it’s transportable size means you will never have to go without the option of motion controlled Time Lapses no matter how constrained your location may be. Visit our website www.syrp.co.nz.
It was the first time in our lifelong, 30+ year yardsale career that we were so organized! We’d been encouraged to try newspapers, but that only gets you listings of people willing to pay to place a classified ad, which is why the internet totally beats dead-tree newspapers in a fight.
Please don't get me wrong. We are blessed. Hubby does have a good job but given everything that has happened we need a second income. And clearly right now I cant work. Even though most of the medical costs are covered under medicare, the financial strain on the family is huge. I really had no idea when we started treatment. I was all "at least its free to treat" "thank goodness we didn't move to the USA" and we are very lucky. I didn't think about all the extras.
The winner of the challenge chosen by Random.org is...
I have personally seen projects fall apart because of miscommunication, caused by not having enough discussion of the nitty-gritty up front.
I’m not entirely sure that I bought the relationship between Liv and Cam. Obviously the romance was already there so there was no budding relationship. She walked out on him six years ago, though, and six years is a very long time to not move on from a three year relationship. Stukkm their interactions were often intense and leant a very different aspect to the book.
Then friends would find me,
laid silently by the shine
Perceptions form our reality, which is not to say that what we perceive is the truth. That becomes quite clear when comparing how we think about ourselves and how others might think about us. Also, we all have a different perception about the world we live in. Put two people in the same situation and you might get two totally different outcomes or at least differing outcomes.
We stopped by the sea and walked out to the Pearl lady statue. It was sooooo cold out there. One begger was out on the rock. What a miserable, cold spot. We were not out there long and then ran back to the car.
It's been getting down to -30 overnight.
Will you look at that!? Here it is – almost the first of November, and it’s been officially fall for a good six weeks now. The weather here in Iowa has been gorgeous, the guys have put in some really good (and long) days in the field, and Thanksgiving is fast approaching.
In fact, according to Awkwardwoman, Snackman has approached Pringles about possibly getting some kind of endorsement deal. “Next time we’ll get you to pop that top!” she cackles and cackles.
It's actually dangerous to not wake a sleepwalker, but many have believed this myth for ages because, perhaps, a few of them have gotten smacked when they woke up their startled somnambulatory friends. Sleepwalkers are certainly prone to feeling that surprise when they don't wake up in their beds but, rather, at the outer limits of their camping grounds. (Oh wait, that was me when I was 10.) Because this is so disorienting, many woken sleepwalkers won't know who you are and become frightened. That said, letting them just walk wherever they want
2) Drop off or mail gift cards to the LLS office – 6811 Shawnee Mission Parkway,
Firstly for my family, friends and clients who check in to my blog from time to time
- He/she would get the best papa in the world, and two fabulous big brothers.
"One of the best '60s San Francisco bands, Moby Grape were also one of the most versatile. Although they are most often identified with the psychedelic scene, their specialty was combining all sorts of roots music - folk, blues, country, and classic rock & roll - with some 'Summer of Love' vibes and multi-layered, triple-guitar arrangements. All of those elements only truly coalesced, however, for their 1967 debut LP. Although subsequent albums had more good moments than many listeners are aware of, a combination of personal problems and bad management effectively killed off the group by the end of the 1960s".
According to 52-year-old James Evans, he was walking his pit bull Max along Cornaga Avenue at around 2 p.m. when he felt he was being electrocuted.
I am weird like Luna. I do and say strange things that may make people doubt my complete sanity. (Luna, face it, when you say, “You’re just as sane as I am.”, that doesn’t reassure people.) I even wear crazy outfits like her.
The current administration doesn't let the church group visit anymore, so they're now in the same position as I am: wondering if there is a way to continue this ministry, and if so, how?
Wonderful reviews are good for the ego, but I never let them go to my head. And rejections might nick me, but I never let them get to my heart.
It's been the longest week in the world already, and it's only Wednesday. But I have the feeling that wonderful things are being built. They're just not ready to share yet.
Actually the dress was originally $26, but my friend remembered seeing that they give a 10% student discount. Which is exactly why my student ID stays in my wallet almost two years after I’ve graduated.
Another great trip in the books. We had some great feedback to our presentation and made some good connections. Even if this was my fourth time in NYC, I find New York is incredible for out-of-towners as there is so much to do and the energy is wicked. Especially if you stay in Times Square.
4. Third World Part II (3:02)
The Eugene Marathon is exactly two months away!
PS: Meryl Streep was nominated for an Oscar for the Best Performance By An Actress in a Lead Role for her role as Miranda Priestly, and she Won a Golden Globe Award for this same role. In total the film garnered another 14 wins and 27 nominations from other groups.
Long and low.
What type of crit do you find most helpful? Have you had bad experiences with critiques? Good experiences? Do you let people know ahead of time what type of feedback works for you?
On a recent 'play day', one of my stamping friends came over to try her hand
How do you think you’ll convince your parents for that!??!
They stared some more. His hands were planted on his hips.
Back to my steamed fish, I vaguely remember reading some online articles on steamed fish served with rice noodle. It's a Teochew-style of cooking, I believe. Coincidentally, I'd frozen 2 stacks of carrot noodle that I made the day before. It was an experiment, by adding carrot puree to the dough, to inject some colour and sweetness to my usual handmade noodle. So, I cooked a handful of the carrot noodles and curled them into the steamed dish. By now, the soy sauce was infused with the spiciness of the ginger and garlic, and sweetness of threadfin, making it a tasty dressing for the noodles.
:5,6 Sing to the Lord; for He has done excellent things: this is known in all the earth. Cry out and shout, you inhabitant of Zion: for great is the Holy One of Israel in the midst of you.
Troy Thurman
‘I really do.’
a poem when it sits down in a room with him.
I had brain-block again today. Even though it's due on Wednesday. Curses! And it was actually my mental curses that inspired me to write today's writing lesson.
Scariest perhaps is the fact that this recipe is a new and improved, “healthier” Chicken McNugget launched in 2003 after a federal judge called the deep-fried poultry bites “a McFrankenstein creation of various elements not utilized by the home cook.” Also terrifying is the fact that these McFrankenuggets are overwhelmingly marketed to children who love their fun shapes and kid-friendly size.
7/26 Charlotte, NC- Time Warner Cable Uptown Amphitheatre
On the local news last night was a very optimistic piece about King Louie West potentially converting to a "Suburban" Museum if the "deal" can be worked out. This would be the first in the nation to present the social discourse of suburbia. Salute and support goes out to the Johnson County Museum for this challenge. (For more info check out the label Manuel Morris, architect of King Louie West)
GREG Rightly then is the dropsical man healed in the Pharisees’ presence, for by the bodily infirmity of the one, is expressed the mental disease of the other.
The moral of this story is twofold: 1) sources such as SFWA’s Estate Project should be consulted as part of any diligent search, and 2) copyright is people. Finding the heir(s) of an author can be very complicated, but that doesn’t mean a work is an orphan simply because several generations have passed since the author died.
This will probably be my last post for a while - I must concentrate on getting ready to go on holiday early on Friday.
Construct your marquee in the usual way, inserting an html/javascript box into your sidebar. Put the code in at the top and the bottom, leaving a big space in between where you'll put the button codes.
Had a busy day visiting my mom in the hospital and going around doing chores with my dad.
If anyone wishes to come after Me, he must deny himself, and take up his cross and follow Me. For whoever wishes to save his life will lose it; but whoever loses his life for My sake will find it. Matthew 16:24-25
Country-code names supporting organisations (ccTLDs) should be responsive to the needs of their local Internet communities, including their local governments and ICANN’s role is to provide a mechanism for global co-ordination when problems cannot be dealt with at national level.
* Your entry MUST fit the Challenge.
2. Remember that learning means changing and change takes time. If I expect to improve my communication easily and quickly, I am in for a disappointment. You don’t go from zero to hero; don’t expect it. You are in for a challenge, so it helps to view it that way. Be happy with every new word, every new sentence, every new concept. Compare where you are now to where you started from. (This works for weight loss diets too…)
-Pour it in to the cake mould and bake for 1 1/2 hours - 1 3/4 hours.
Mr Joyce, Labour MP for Falkirk, was apprehended by the police on suspicion of assault after an incident in the bar at around 11pm last night. The fracas started after Joyce apparently complained that the bar was “full of Tories”. This allegedly led to him pushing one Tory MP and throwing punches at others. Drinks were then thrown and it’s also alleged that he planted a Glaswegian kiss on Stuart Andrew, MP for Pudsey.
As you go about your daily life, you may notice sights, sounds, smells and sensations like the alarm clock buzzing, the coffee brewing downstairs, the music on the radio, the seams of your socks, the heat (or coldness) of the room you’re sitting in and the flavor of your lunch. While you may notice some stimuli, you ignore or fail to notice others. Not so for many ADHD people! They notice all of the above, and then some.
This goes hand in hand with our new challenge which is:-
Link to the wordle:
Word on the street is that Loki has somewhat of a “bad” reputation. Just the mention of his name can bring the best of heathens to the point of lewd shouting matches, and has certainly made many a face twist with a look of utter disgust. “He’s a trickster and untrustworthy”, some say. Others simply shake their head and walk away. I stand, planted in my position, and await the storm’s pass, always asking myself how anyone could see my “Lord of Light” in such negative terms.
A lot of us attempt to go on a vacation once per year to escape the Canadian winter for a week. Wow, a whole week! An overpriced trip to a resort where the locals are underpaid. Not what one would call a culturally immersive experience.
So today, I revisited ASOS to take a peek at what's new in the world of Vero Moda. And I was absolutely smitten with their floaty chiffon dresses, sheer billowy sleeves and adorable-sometimes-funky prints-- all with the perfect touch of the 70s, which is so on trend this season. Below are my faves:
This strong performance by Golden Dawn is a fairly clear indication of some of the troubles ahead for Greece and its people.
In a large skillet, add 1 TBSP olive oil over medium heat. Add beef, onion, salt, and pepper to the pan and brown meat.
Just as a lot of visual poetry is more properly seen as being part of contemporary artistic practice than standing on the shoulders of literary giants, much of the more innovative web writing is hardly writing at all, in that sense, but multimedia, like Kate Pullinger's Inanimate Alice. "Media arts" is a cross genre label that can be spectacular - but where the literary component is crowded out by everything else.
This is the most studied input for the Breast Crawl and is believed to be the most important. Babies preferred their mother's unwashed breast to her washed breast, soon after birth. (Varendi et al, 1994). Besides secreting milk and colostrum, the nipple and areola are dense in glands that perhaps secrete attractive odours. Washing could have reduced or eliminated such odours. This is consistent with a previous study (Makin and Porter, 1989) where infants preferentially moved towards a gauze pad impregnated with the breast odour of a lactating woman.
How is your Tuesday morning going?
The nurse perused the file for a long time, then shook her head. "No, sorry," she said. "I'll have to get the doctor for that. Just a moment." She reached for the phone.
In an article for the Times Higher Education magazine on lust, part of a feature on the seven deadly sins of universities, Kealey wrote: “Normal girls – more interested in abs than in labs, more interested in pecs than specs, more interested in triceps than tripos – will abjure their lecturers for the company of their peers, but nonetheless, most male lecturers know that, most years, there will be a girl in class who flashes her admiration and who asks for advice on her essays.
I didn’t understand. I went closer.
Me, "Nope. All the same."
My favorite African story actually happened after I left the country. An American executive took a job over there, and on his very first day, the newspaper headlines read: "Three Headless Bodies Found".
The Tió log comes knocking at your house on Dec. 8th – the Day of the Immaculate Conception. He comes in, you give him a good spot in your living room and you cover him with a blanket to keep him warm. Tió watches and takes note. And each night the kids feed him some sweet wine, frutos secos (dried fruits), nuts and a mandarin orange. (FYI mandarins are just as popular here as in Canada at this time of year.)
“Friends With Kids” is funny, alarmingly true-to-life at times, improbable at others but worth seeing as a parent – just don’t take the kids. It’s definitely an adults’ movie due to sexuality and language.
Hillary
"A boy finds a salamander in the woods and imagines the many things he can do to turn his room into a perfect salamander home. Together, Anne Mazer and Steve Johnson have created a woodland paradise that any salamander would love to share with a child." Amazon.
She seriously ate two pieces of lettuce... or, rather, dandelion. Okay, I will admit it. It was tough, but... but... honestly? Not as hard as I had thought it would be!
But the really annoying thing is that I have a GCSE between now and then. Religious. *Yawn*. So that’s one slightly bad thing. And then then the week I get back I have not 1, not 2, but 3 (THREE!!!) exams. Slightly annoying. But the worst part is that it means I’ll have to revise on holiday.
The property boundaries are marked off with hedges or crumbling rock walls.
Jesse: I… I don’t believe that. I don’t believe that.
Sones also complained that he did not have an opportunity to rebut the evidence included by the Examining Attorney in the final office action, but the Board pointed out that he should have requested remand if he wanted to put in rebuttal evidence.
Two, participation in Ponzi schemes is voluntary. Not so with Social Security. The government automatically withholds payroll taxes and “invests” them for you.
302) a heart-warming note of gratitude from a friend who appreciated my daughter babysitting for her
I vanished for a while, and I’m sorry. Please please forgive me. My laptop, my faithful friend for 5 years… kicked the bucket. Well, it’s not completely dead. The screen went bad (probably the graphics card, which according to Apple may or may not be defective). Had to get a new one, and had to remember that I started something.
How many of us bother to just say hello?! or even smile at someone we know when we pass by them on the corridor at work?! When all it takes is even a virtual poke or a text message, there seems to be hardly any effort to keep in touch. If someone calls out of the blue, the thought that crosses one’s mind is …ok so what does that person want?! Get to the point already!!!
Boy, Born November 29, 2007
The Muslim state would continue to represent a terrorist threat to the parent state, and would make continuous attempts to subvert and destroy it. It would be able to reinforce its position militarily in a way which would have been impossible if it had consisted solely of scattered Muslim ghettoes under the watchful eye of the original state. With control over its own borders, it could import the arms and equipment needed to build defences that would make it extremely hard to take by conventional assault, as per Hezbollah in southern Lebanon.
You leave a comment and sometimes what you have said inspires that blogger to comment back.
In other news, we have a wedding coming up in our family. My middle child, my son will be getting married on June 9! We are excited and looking forward to the festivities. And yes, there will be pictures! He is also starting Vet School in the fall...so we are excited about that for him. AND..........there is another grandbaby since last time I blogged! I had the pleasure of spending 15 days with them during her arrival. Loved my extended time with them! I will be posting pics of her, too.
Well Jesus was the first preacher of the gospel, the real O.G. (you know I’m funny…), so I decided to turn directly to Jesus for inspiration. No, not just to his words, but more specifically to his sermon: the Sermon on the Mount.
Specific services that may be required to perform an asset tracing investigation include but are not limited to:
Practice running, diving, sprinting and sliding into home plate while carrying your paintball gun is also attached to a lot more hazardous.... however, all people might claim that paintball schemes currently have become obsolete through time and no longer be available in the osiris paintball gun it provides makes it more challenging and with that maybe it can be concealed one way, yet revealed to another player who has a different line of products which include models like the osiris paintball gun is they're all very high quality guns but cost less than 400 dollars. But wow, that is often where the osiris paintball gun is 50 yards.
I am addicted to myself.
There isn't Android Market in all Android phones. This is what I learned recently in hard way. I bought an Android phone without Android Market. I've never heard about something like this. Without market this phones are totally useless and trash. I searched for apps about few hours, it took awhile to discover there isn't a real app market and of course; it was a disaster.
Fragile conscience,
Observers in the Reno-Sparks area of Nevada reported seeing a fireball at about 8 a.m. local time, accompanied or followed by a thunderous clap that experts said could have been a sonic boom from the meteor or the sound of it breaking up high over the Earth.
This whole experience has made me want to change so many things. I want to stop living for tomorrow. For the next project. For the next job or big raise. I want to live life now. If I feel like I want to do something, I need to just do it! I need to make smarter choices with my health. I need to get more rest. I need to worry more about God's agenda than my own. I need to draw close to him, because ultimately some day I will have to leave this world and with God is where I want to be! I want to enjoy my husband and where we are at right now. Not looking forward to the next big stage. Things will happen when the time is right. I want to leave dirty dishes in the sink so that I can enjoy an hour of TV or game time. If money is tight, that is life. I don't want to stress or argue over it.
They showed him their proof, a print out of a black-and-white graph.
Who wrote it: Greg and Lisa Popcak are a husband-wife team of Catholic radio personalities with psychology backgrounds and 3 kids.
(4) Can a temporary act of reproduction be regarded as “transient” where part of the reproduction, consisting of one or more text extracts of 11 words, is stored?
Off-level singing or changing distance causes a degradation in quality but is all part of "working the mic,"
Blanket the ground
The big question is whether these problems, as they manifest themselves in the U.S.A., are solvable. Current orthodoxy is that they are, and offers a laundry list of solution methods. Fix the schools! End poverty! Stamp out racism! Affirmative action! Fifty years ago a thoughtful person could sign on to those prescriptions. I know: I was around: I did. Yes (we said) once unjust laws had been struck down, and some social massaging of that sort been done for a few years, the races would merge in happy harmony, and the word "race" and its derivatives would drop out of the language. We all believed that. I believed it.
So as I write this, I am feeling better about this plan of action. I suppose I didn't think things through clearly at first...or maybe I just wanted that apple pie.
Maternity clothes? I was boycotting for a long time, but at about week 18 or 19 I finally gave in when a colleague brought me her pants, BUT I am only wearing the pants so far.
his efforts can come to nothing,
Not usually but sometimes either Alyssa, my 3 1/2 year old, or Dave. She can do some killer planks and burpees, no joke. When I took too long of a rest between planks last week, she was like “um, mom why are you just laying there? lets go”. Dave and I will run together with the double stroller or do circuit workouts together on the weekends sometimes. But mostly, I workout solo during the day while Dave is at work and the kids are napping.
Listen? Touch it–the texture
God used Nehemiah in a powerful way at a critical time in his plan of salvation. And Nehemiah drew his strength from the character of God which he saw expressed in requirements of the law and temple.
The first thing I do is peel 2 garlic cloves and place them on a piece of heavy duty tin foil. Heavy duty tin foil is essential or put the tin foil on a tray. The last thing you want is olive oil leaking out all over you oven. Next drizzle the garlic cloves with some olive oil (about 2 tsp). Finally sprinkle the olive oil with about 1/2 tsp. of salt. Then form the tin foil into a ball being careful to seal in the garlic and olive oil. I like to roast mine in the toaster oven so that I do not have to heat up my oven. Either way, roast the garlic at 375 for about 13-15 minutes or until it is golden brown. You have now done most of the work to making hummus. The rest is so simple and fast to whip up.
You will start to notice that I will be sharing alot more about our personal lives, ministries, daily activities and what God is doing in our home, church and family now that I am in a position to do so. We have been in some crazy church situations the past several years that have prevented me from sharing much. If I am being completely honest, the only truly positive situation we have been in, besides the one we are in now, was our first church out of seminary. You will understand more when you read the aforementioned book and our upcoming ebook "find joy in the journey."
So whether we are here in this body or away from this body, our goal is to please him.I set up my little end of the dining room table to do my study this morning and was mildly devastated to discover that I'd left my composition note pad, otherwise known as my journal, on my desk at the office. Journaling is a major part of my quiet time routine, and has been for the past five or six years. I was actually tempted to skip my quiet time in response to this little mishap. Then I remembered this blog. Heathenism averted.
Erikoussa‘ on the map – the northernmost island of Greece, Erikoussa lies about 10 Kilometers northwest of the island of Corfu. The sparsely inhabited island is a perfect destination for all those content to roam its mostly isolated beaches. Coordinates: 39° 53‘ N, 19° 35‘ E
#39260
The technology has to be developed, first and foremost, before these companies are allowed to BLOW SMOKE UP OUR ASSES, and submit papers filled with lies and bullshit in order to get operating permits. SEVEN oil companies have submitted plans to protect the WALRUS'S in the Gulf of Mexico, while also promising to be able to clean up any and all spills. THERE ARE ABSOLUTELY NO WALRUS'S IN THE GULF OF MEXICO. What fucking idiots.
Lim was alleged to have said: “Penang was number one last year in terms of cutting crime by 27 per cent. For the first six months… also cut crime by another 25 per cent. Whereas in Johor, a Singaporean is likely to get kidnapped. Won’t have that problem when you come to Penang.”
“Images, video and sound recordings of the Games taken by a Ticket Holder cannot be used for any purpose other than for private and domestic purposes and a Ticket Holder may not license, broadcast or publish video and/or sound recordings, including on social networking websites and the Internet more generally.”
Chairman Mao (1940 speech):
* White Card Base
Anyways, I’m staying at home sick today, so instead of staring at a computer in a cubicle I’m staring at my laptop whilst lounging on my couch at home, and I thought there’d be no better time to update the world on our lives than the present.
An interesting issue that sometimes comes up is whether the photograph is an original work or merely the result of know-how on the part of the photographer (this distinction between originality and know-how is also evident in cases dealing with potential copyright protection for perfumes). In a recent ruling by the Cour de cassation (Supreme Court), protection was denied, with the Court approving the lower court's finding that the photograph was not a protected work in the following terms:
“People at Arsenal tried to make out that I came here for the money, I hope they are watching me now collecting my Premier League winner’s medal.
this might be the last weekend of the year to hang out in the backyard.
What if Forest City Ratner continues to crank up the Atlantic Yards marketing machine? What if more people think the project is a done deal?
Houses / Nora Almeida
FG=1.020@66F (I bet the chocolate is throwing this measurement off)
They take us to a luxurious hotel right near the University hospital, in a rather interesting neighborhood, my boss assures me. There are plenty of shops and restaurants around, and the subway is right there. But it's the wrong hotel. Our hotel has almost the same name, and it's attached to the convention center, which is half an hour away, near the site of the old airport. Yep. In the middle of nowhere fun. If you could find a way off the grounds on foot, there's nothing but freeway and industry around.
Fluently translated by her friend and interpreter Alyona Kojevnikov, Information Director of Keston College in Kent, Grey is the Colour of Hope contains some of Irina Ratushinskayas previously unpublished poems.
For a lot of parents those three simple words can conjure up a wealth of emotions. Usually most mums at the school gate (from my own observations) fall into one of two groups. a) the clique b) the rest. Often we waver between the two. In the clique when X happens, amongst the rest when Y happens. Please insert the appropriate occasions/events/incidences from your own experiences. Some times we welcome and relish the school gate. An opportunity to talk to another adult about something other than Daleks and Moshi Monsters or to glean the latest news about the woman you were friends with yesterday and who today is your bitterest enemy. At others we hide in the car pretending to read the naff leaflet our child deposited on the back seat about a month ago which is now covered in something sticky and barely legible, just so we can avoid the clique. Or at the very least be so unobtrusive as to hopefully stop ourselves being drawn to their attention and thereby avoid being the target of the ‘look’ and the ‘mouthed’ but whispered comments. If you don’t know the ‘look’ or the ‘mouthed’ comments then you have either never been to the school gate or never been outside the clique. Anyway I digress.
1) Collect Gift Cards at your workplace and an LLS staff person or volunteer will
Coming to Australia the stereotyping has gone in the opposite direction. Overtly, the name has regained its authentic connotation. By this I mean the religious meaning. Wherever I go and say my name, an instant question pops up; Hi Abdul, you are Muslim, aren’t you? I always feel taken back by such a question. There are many reasons for that. Firstly, the scepticism that surrounded my name through my early life has denied me the right to be a ‘Muslim’ at least from the perspective of the society in which I grew up. . Secondly, the entrenched secular traditions in my town have made it difficult to think of religion as a way of redemption let alone make me a religious person. Therefore, I always feel I don’t have a clear cut answer to such a question. All I know is that I have never been in a struggle with myself over whether Allah existed or not, nor I am in need of adopting an Islamic identity. However, the question is always striking and confusing although it has became very expected. The answer has never been easy or normal. Till this moment, it takes me some time to get the ‘right’ answer. This usually comes with mumbling and confusion.
Knowles’s study of home-educated adults found that they’ve grown up to be largely autonomous, independent, and have learned to make way themselves. "I think that’s one of the major advantages of home education that kids don’t have their self esteem attacked by other kids so much in the home context: they become a lot more secure in who they are."
So what do you want the culture of your team or company to be? What are the characteristics you would want anyone and everyone to use to describe the atmosphere?
One of my favorite recipes, I'm a big fan of cheeses specially on pizza and lasagna when milted in the oven, it's so easy and so quick, you can do it anytime.
50g of soft light brown sugar (1/4 cup packed)
unified public face for evangelicism for social action and public engagement. In fact, the self-description of Christianity Today at its’ founding in 1956 was as, “transdenominational literature speaking in a clear voice on behalf of evangelical Christianity.” This is no doubt a noble intention, and it has probably had some of the intended effect of promoting moral dialogue and displaying for the world a truer model of justice then self-interest.
Apparently there is something called "Paris Syndrome," as described in the Wall Street Journal review. Thomas Chatterton Williams notes: "Though more than 15 million foreigners visit Paris annually—it is the most visited city in the world—Paris Syndrome is not exactly a pandemic. But it is the extreme end of a spectrum of disappointment to which all visitors to Paris will feel susceptible, if they linger long enough."
Today's post is quick and sweet using the Bold Blossom stamp from the Occasions Mini. I stamped the leaves in Old Olive and the flowers in Pink Pirouette. I added the crocheted flower handmade by me personally. I used to crochet before I got hooked on stamping. Every now and then , I'd like to add it to my projects. Hope you like it.
Part of it is the fact we're used to seeing ourselves in the mirror, with our faces in reverse, so when we see them the right way round, they look a bit odd to us. Very, very few of us have perfectly symmetrical faces.
A gunman has shot and killed a retired Mexican army general at a garage in Mexico City, authorities said. Gen. Mario Acosta Chaparro was accused in 2000 of ties to the Juarez drug cartel in northern Mexico, but later exonerated.
Just like not knowing for these past 20 weeks has been fun &exciting!
This week I start the new job. I say new even though it's with the same employer and it's still teaching. The only difference is that I'll be teaching on campus and it will be topics that I haven't really taught before. Luckily, the pedagogical methods are similar, and if history is any indicator, I perform very well when I'm under stress and nervous. It's not very fun being nervous though. I'm taking everything a day at a time, because if I think about everything I have to do, I get all panicky. It's exciting too, my classroom has a smartboard in it and all the students have laptops on their desks and we have the internet, speakers and everything. Yay! It seems that for the first time in over ten years here in Quebec, I will finally have a steadier income that is above the poverty level. FINALLY! And I owe it all to my old mentor, the guy who trained me to be an ESL teacher. Thanks A!
"No. . . " Kevin said.
Beth Hurwood, the daughter of the main villain and Shandy's love interest will not be winning any awards for memorable female lead. She spends 99% of the novel as a dyed-in-the-wool templated Damsel-In-Distress, only to suddenly become a heroic counterpart to Shandy in the last 6 pages or so. One is reminded of the character played by Lysette Anthony in Krull, who spends the whole movie waiting for a rescue and then at the end uses the Krullian marriage ceremony to give the hero a power boost to kill the villain...
This Post is for the Ones You Love from Rachelle Gardner. Peek: "Congratulations on having the fabulous good fortune of living with a writer-type. There are many great things about being involved with a writer, among them..."
If you can find it in your heart and within your means to donate, I hope that you do. And I thank you for reading this. If you can’t afford to, please pass this along to someone else, and so on.
And, all the while, there is another voice telling me to stop the madness and be open and speak your peace and if you have asked for something you truly don't deserve then the Universe will take care of that and set you straight.
A Macrobrew Economy — a high-volume, low-price model — asks us to compete with other such economies throughout the world, and the problem is that countries like China will always have lower-priced labor, more lax environmental regulations and lower production standards to win a battle that rewards more and cheaper for more’s and cheaper’s sake. By contrast, a Craft Brew Economy — a high-quality, lower-volume model — is
I unwound...a tiny little bit.
I am comforted by the fact that most of these people who say these things love me dearly. These are the same people who pray for me, help out with my needs during these tumultuous times and love me when I am whacked out on hormones. So I hope this blog will help not only those who have heard these things, but those who are trying to support loved ones going through this. I look forward to all of your additions to the list.
Softly structured, the Abbesses is perfect for business or travel, easily moving from a large city bag to a casual briefcase. With a discreet outside strap that slips onto the handle of the Pgase rolling suitcase.
“All this took place to fulfill what the Lord had said through the prophet: ‘The virgin will be with child and will give birth to a son, and they will call him Immanuel’—which means, ‘God with us.’”
» studio View
Sometimes we can do no better than to turn to William Shakespeare when a doleful moment arises. He wrote quite a bit and profoundly too about vital issues and what we should do about them. Take for example his sonnet LXIV:
Several minutes later he concludes with a great act of machismo. Maybe he yelled “BOOM!” and pumped his fist. But I don’t know. I’m not paying attention to what he says. I came here to be quick, concise, and fill in any blanks. I note a key piece of information that should be relayed to these newbies.
Between them they are draining the power from the nation’s people.
Abortion is… a lot more complicated than religious and political leaders on both sides make it out to be.
Keep the flatbreads warm whilst you are cooking by wrapping them in a tea-towel or popping them in the oven at a low heat.
Otherwise known as Gaining New Vocabulary...
How did this happen? Those first few kids, whomever they were, had no intent to promote Hush Puppy Shoes. “They were wearing them precisely because no one else would,” says Gladwell. The fad spread to two fashion designers who used the shoes to promote something else; haute couture. Somehow the viral resurgence of a brand given up for dead passed a certain point and they “tipped.” Understanding the world of “viral epidemics” whch can rise and fall on one dramatic moment may be a key to altering the trend of anything. It’s THE LAW OF THE FEW.
Yep, there actually is a Part 3 to the peanut allergy post!
ask. and you will receive.
*************WINNERS ANNOUNCED!! ****************
On a related note, it's in the combat section that the role of the Referee - or DM / GM - first seems to need a little more explanation, a general picture of play. Almost anyone who's roleplayed will be familiar with the idea in some form, but a short overview of the concept and some guidance would help the less experienced.
An example of someone who is living in his personal greatness is Tim Merry. Tim loves to work with people. He believes that we all have a potential, within ourselves and together, that hold the answers to the problems we face in our lives – whether that be in our families, communities, organizations, networks or world. His passion is creating participative processes that enable each of us to work together and enjoy overcoming seemingly impossible challenges.
To celebrate the Pirates victory, I will show off a new Andrew McCutchen card I added to my collection for $3.25. It's a grey jersey swatch from 2012 Gypsy Queen. I had gotten the white jersey in a break hosted by Cardboard Heaven. This is my 70th Andrew McCutchen hit I own with hopefully many more to come.
COVER STORIES
10. I would like to cheer on the candidates who are contesting for any post anywhere through the democratic process. Obviously, only one would win. If those who lose cannot accept the decision of the majority of the members, then it is better not to talk about democracy. You really do not know what democracy is about (of course I am assuming the contest is fair).
You see, I practically grew up backstage of a small theater where my father was gainfully employed as an actor. The props were my first toys, the rehearsals my play dates. I knew from early on that it was all pretend, and yet...
to its former glory. I can't wait!
She doesn’t believe that Chadians love their children less than the Clermonts love their own children. “They don’t have the resources to do anything when they need to, a lot of the time,” she said.
ARTISTE: Norbert Kraft
The week before last, I was working a lot on this set of 6 napkins and place mats. My husband and I had a wedding to attend and I knew that the bride likes some of the things that I sew. Facebook helped me figure out that her favorite color was orange, so I choose these fabrics from my local quilt shop to work with.
Angela did not want to move back into the home she owned. Her son was now living in her home. He did not pay rent, because with a paid mortgage, Angela could not fathom charging her own family.
I went right after work, and right after work, I am so hungry I want to gnaw on my arms. I've tried snacking through the day, and eating fruit at the end of my shift, eating a later lunch, a bigger lunch, a smaller lunch... none of it matters. 5PM is when I need to eat. If I don't, I become a psychotic ravening beast who may cut you off in traffic or say something rude about your hair. It ain't pretty.
It added: ‘The reported benefits for children with least advantage, the grounds on which universal childcare is often justified, stands opposite to negative outcomes for the bulk of children.’
(I have Kindle version)
My favorite style of mosaic is made with hand-cut tiles called Pique Assiette (loosely translated it means cracked china). All types of glass or china used in mosaics is call "tesserae." I cut antique or vintage dinnerware into tiles specifically made for mosaics. Contrary to popular belief, the china is cut with special cutters or nippers NOT smashed with a hammer.
Meyer is the daughter of Jennifer and the late Robert Forrest of Suring and of the late Keith Gruber of Coleman.
Knead dough for about 10 minutes on floured surface. Don't worry, it’s a joy to knead as the dough is smooth and highly malleable.
But then again, we don’t really live.. we exist.
In an instant, the hackles on my well muscled neck rose and my fight or flight instinct kicked in. This is saying a lot for a country like China has more than its share of oddballs. After all, what would you expect when only a few decades back, siblings were considered a nutritous supplement to one’s lunch or dinner and the murder of teachers thought to be patriotic. In a word, this place has some very very bizarre people.
First off...
1 bonds
We finally moved into our house on May 4th. Last night was the first time I'd even opened my computer since moving in. We've been a tad busy.
We told him yes and that we were now running quite late.
6. What would you like to have in 2011 that you lacked in 2010?
Intention is not age or time-dependent. It does not matter if you are 22 and just starting your career or 62 and pondering retirement. You can review your job goals and redefine your employment objectives at any time.
4:00 – The Ellen Degeneres Show (NBC): Robert Downey Jr. and Scarlett Johansson show up to talk about The Avengers! Hurray!
My heart goes out to each and every person effected in some way by the terrible events occurring not just in SE Queensland, but right around Australia in recent weeks.
